



Milestone Group PLC

















                                    History
                                






The following is a brief overview of Milestone’s main corporate activities since the Company’s admission to AIM in July 2003:
Milestone Group PLC was admitted to AIM on 1st July 2003. The Company originally had three separate divisions in publishing, radio and television – each with its own subsidiary companies. With the advent of new technologies, the original analogue divisions in Milestone Group gradually became redundant, with the final division closing in 2009.
Since then, the Company has focused on the digital media and technology sector with the intention of using media for good and building a brand synonymous with making a difference. By design, the Milestone Group has built a range of products and services, which, through our flagship product the Passion Project, produce a self-sufficient ecosystem of commercial opportunities and social impact for both the company and its clients. These products and services cover a range of activities including education, training and publishing, the details of which can be viewed by visiting the 'what we do' areas of this website. 

























Milestone Group PLC
























                                        We love what we do
                                    












                                        And do what we love
                                    








Previous



Next









                                        We like to keep things simple
                                    








Previous



Next


















                               What We Do 
                            

                                Milestone Group combines and leverages creative services and technologies to deliver high-value services and content. We develop solutions that are intelligent and effective, to ensure a positive impact on our clients’ bottom line.
                            

                                From public sector to consumer brands & services, Milestone Group PLC combines experience and expertise to deliver brilliant and effective media and technology solutions that bring business to life.
                            













                            Our business is made of many parts. Together they are stronger.
                        















                                Our Services
                            











































                                Digital
                            

                                We offer solutions for a wide range of digital and marketing needs. From bespoke creative campaigns to affordable mobile management tools, we deliver solutions to projects with diverse requirements, providing value from conception to delivery. Our unique collection of tools is used to create new platforms and facilitate projects with a focus on youth engagement.
                            




                                Publishing
                            

                                We provide artists with the means to publish and distribute their music globally via the Nexstar music-publishing platform and are publishers of one of the UK's most influential youth magazines and digital platforms, Disorder Magazine. We also publish materials for our education and training products, including Winning in the Game of Life™.
                            




                                Financial
                            

                                We provide financial solutions for a variety of issues, including virtual bank accounts, loyalty and rewards cards, prepaid debit cards and a cryptocurrency service. These services cater to the unique needs of customers, particularly those who face challenges in procuring traditional bank accounts or debit cards.
                            














                            We're ready to start the journey with you.
                        















                                The Group
                            
























































                                Relative
                            

                                Relative is an award-winning digital agency with a big heart and an eye for detail. Specialising in the creation of digital experiences that are beautiful, brand activations that are deeply immersive, and campaigns with high impact, Relative meet and then go beyond the needs of its clients.  
                            

Read More




                                Mobile & Business Solutions
                            

                                Mobile Business Solutions is a highly scalable, affordable and flexible mobile management and reporting suite of SaaS tools that address the needs of a wide range of sectors.
                            

                                MBS specialises in meeting the demands of businesses who require secure, real-time auditing and administration of field operatives and assets.
                            

Read More




                                Disorder
                            

                                Disorder Magazine is an independent, cutting-edge and constantly evolving youth magazine featuring the best in new fashion, music, art, technology and film. 
                            

                                Disorder Magazine has remained true to its ethos of breaking new talent since its inception in 1999, both on its pages and behind the scenes. It features acts, trends and entertainment ahead of the mainstream and continues to launch the careers of some of the UK's leading lights in photography, design and journalism.
                            

Read More




                                Winning in the Game of Life™
                            

                                Winning in the Game of Life™ is a school's' curriculum-based programme that is designed to build young people's emotional intelligence and lead to the development of positive lifelong relationships and improved self-esteem.
                            

Read More




                                The Passion Project
                            

                                The Passion Project is a social engagement programme created to help combat youth unemployment whilst encouraging individual self-development. The programme helps young people identify their natural skill sets and matches them with appropriate vocation and employment opportunities.
                            

                                The Passion Project brings together representatives from public, private and third sector organisations with the intention of creating an end to end, joined-up and holistic careers service for young people.
                            

Read More




                                Nexstar
                            

                                Nexstar is a leading-edge technology provider, delivering solutions to industry leaders within the employee recognition, employee performance, customer loyalty and reward and product promotions market segments. 
                            

                                Nexstar offers its clients access to an alternative, world-class digital delivery platform that supports multiple digital assets like movies, TV, apps and games, on both a subscription and transactional basis. Fully integrated into major social media platforms, and facilitating Money Over IP payments, in addition to points and cash, this platform underpins a series of global initiatives in multiple vertical markets including Loyalty and Incentive, Retail and B2B. Nexstar also develop products with white-label capabilities, enabling clients access to products which are branded specifically to them.
                            

Read More





















 



Product Ordering | Milestone Group plc. All Rights Reserved. Winning in the Game of Life is a trademark of Spirituality For Kids International, Inc. The Winning in the Game of Life programme is officially licensed by Spirituality For Kids International, Inc.






































About the Programme

How was the Programme developed?
What does the Programme involve?
When will Winning in the Game of Life launch?
The Project’s Supporters


The Pilot

Pilot Results
Pilot Materials

Documents and Workbooks
The Lessons

Start Here
Lesson 1 – Life is Like a Game
Lesson 2 – Fulfillment
Lesson 3 – The Light
Lesson 4 – I am a Key Player
Lesson 5 – My Opponent
Lesson 6 – My Choices
Lesson 7 – Making an Effort
Lesson 8 – The 4 Step Formula
Lesson 9 – The Power of Sharing
Lesson 10 – How to Share
Lesson 11 – We Are All Connected
Lesson 12 – Change Begins With Me
The Epiloque






How Can I Purchase?





Product Ordering




Please select the required packages.
Quantities can be modified in the shopping cart.
VAT will be added before payment finalised on Paypal website



Product Packs




Pack 1 – 30 Pupils
Includes:
• DVD (13 video lessons)
• 1 x Guidance notes
• 1 x Teacher’s handbook
• 30 x Pupil’s Workbooks
• 30 x Reflective journals
• One year licence

£1499.00



Pack 2 – 20 Pupils
Includes:
• DVD (13 video lessons)
• 1 x Guidance notes
• 1 x Teacher’s handbook
• 20 x Pupil’s Workbooks
• 20 x Reflective journals
• One year licence

£1239.00



Parent’s Handbook

£9.49



Individual Items
The following items can be purchased in conjunction with Pack 1 or Pack 2 above. Please contact us with your order details to purchase.




Guidance notes
£24.99



Teacher’s handbook
£49.99



Pupil’s workbook*
£12.99



Reflective Journal*
£12.99



DVD Pack
Includes:
• DVD (13 video lessons)
• One year licence
£644.99



 





Your Shopping CartYour cart is empty
 







 


            © 2017
                Milestone Group plc. All Rights Reserved. Winning in the Game of Life is a trademark of Spirituality For Kids International, Inc. The Winning in the Game of Life programme is officially licensed by Spirituality For Kids International, Inc.            

↑

















Milestone Group PLC : Launch of New KYC Platform 

















































































English
Français











Register
Sign In












Milestone Group PLC : Launch of New KYC Platform




















June 22, 2017 02:01 ET

 | Source: Milestone Group PLC





 MILESTONE GROUP PLC ("Milestone" or the "Company")  Launch of New KYC Platform Milestone (AIM: MSG), the AIM and Social Stock Exchange quoted provider of digital media, technology and social impact solutions announces that Black Cactus Holdings, its joint venture partner in Nexstar, a subsidiary of Milestone, has launched a KYC (Know your customer) and AML (Anti Money Laundering) platform.  The new platform is part of a fintech solution designed to be used by those organisations involved in banking, gaming, insurance and card programmes amongst others. The platform ties into a number of major global databases to carry out background checks on both individuals and Corporates, these include criminal records, financial & personal history, sex offender registries, employment and payroll services databases, insurance and all other KYC and AML requirements. The new KYC and AML platform has been developed to significantly reduce the processing time for each full background check application from weeks to days, making it more business responsive. The release of the product to the UK and European marketplace via Nexstar is to be accompanied by a marketing campaign commencing on 1st July 2017 with a mobile version scheduled to be released in August 2017, this will embed biometric capabilities and computer vision for facial recognition. Nexstar will charge clients a fee per case processed and an ongoing monthly fee, which will be determined separately for each client offering the Company an opportunity for immediate revenue generation. The KYC platform has been designed to work on traditional banking and financial systems as well as new fintech technologies with a strong bias towards blockchain, hyperledger, cryptocurrency and internet of things following several years of development. The product has been in development and pre-release in North America for the past year, and has been used by over 200 companies as part of that process. A list of these companies can be found at https://www.blackcactusholdings.com/kyc-aml This platform has initially been created for the fintech sector, but with increased concerns over global security, is a landmark development bringing security checks and KYC into a real-time capability for all sectors, substantially expanding our potential market base for the product. Deborah White, CEO of Milestone commented: "The KYC platform, which will be marketed by Milestone Group and its subsidiary Nexstar is a significant leap forward for organisations globally keen to have the KYC processing time brought down from the current average of 3 weeks. Having the ability to process this in a matter of minutes, safe in the knowledge that the time reduction has also been made more secure through the use of hyper ledger, is expected to interest many organisations globally." About KYC Know Your Customer (KYC) is the process of a business identifying the identity of its clients. The term is also used to refer to the bank and anti-money laundering regulations that govern these activities. The objectives of KYC guidelines are to prevent banks from being intentionally or unintentionally used by criminal elements for money laundering activities.  About Nexstar Nexstar, a joint venture entity between Milestone and Black Cactus, is a technology provider delivering fintech, blockchain, hyperledger, cryptocurrency and digital entertainment solutions. The Nexstar platform is designed to meet the needs of clients, offering access to unique financial technology, which has global regulatory as well as transactional (downloadable) content from a number of global providers. This announcement contains inside information for the purposes of Article 7 of EU Regulation 596/2014. For further information:  Milestone Group PLC     Deborah White, Chief Executive  Tel: 0207 929 7826        Cairn Financial Advisers LLP, Nominated Adviser     Liam Murray/Sandy Jamieson  Tel: 0207 213 0880        Hybridan LLP, Broker     Claire Louise Noyce  Tel: 0203 764 2341        Walbrook PR Limited, PR     Gary Middleton/Paul Cornelius/Paul Whittington  Tel: 0207 933 8780  


Related Articles
More articles issued by Milestone Group PLC
More articles related to:
 Other News 






Profile

Milestone Group PLC





  Subscribe via RSS
 Subscribe via ATOM
 Javascript



  London,  UNITED KINGDOM



















Newswire Distribution Network & Management



Home
Newsroom
RSS Feeds
Legal
Contact Us






About Us
GlobeNewswire, a Nasdaq company, is one of the world's largest newswire distribution networks, specializing in the delivery of corporate press releases financial disclosures and multimedia content to the media, investment community, individual investors and the general public.
            









© 2017 GlobeNewswire, Inc. All Rights Reserved.







變頻器,PLC控制器,安川代理商,國際牌代理商,視覺對位系統,歐姆龍控制器


































繁體中文 │  English










可程式控制器的人機介面



公司簡介  服務項目 產品介紹公司位置 聯絡我們





鑫弘展企業有限公司屬於自動化電機電子類產品的貿易商，提供國內外客戶所需各項產品外，更引進國外先進技術，協助客戶系統的規劃、諮詢、技術的支援及問題的克服，而不是單純的買賣業，而自動化是世界的趨勢，需結合電子、電機、資訊、網路、機械......等等領域，運用各種最先進技術，來達成客戶的需求，而且為了增加客戶的需求，還附屬室內裝潢業的導入來跟進世界的趨勢讓生活有更高的品質，如智慧型住宅、節能減碳、太陽能......等等，可以讓顧客一次購足別再尋找其他商品的時間，除此之外，本公司朝向經營多元化、產業多角化、系統整合方案、商品多樣化的目標來發展，來提供客戶最好的服務。







專業的貿易商滿足您的所有需求



聯絡電話:02-2848-3135    傳真:02-2848-8271    聯絡地址:24743新北市蘆洲區民族路506號5樓
        Copyright    ©    2013 變頻器-鑫弘展企業有限公司. All Rights Reserved. Design by web5000 網頁設計.


Sitemap 三菱代理商 歐姆龍代理商







		Milestone Group PLC : Launch of New KYC Platform - RNS - London Stock Exchange

 






 




 



Regulatory Story


Go to market news section

  
			
			










Milestone Group PLC  -  MSG   
Milestone Group PLC : Launch of New KYC Platform
Released 07:00 22-Jun-2017













Milestone Group PLC : Launch of New KYC Platform
MILESTONE GROUP PLC ("Milestone" or the "Company")  Launch of New KYC Platform Milestone (AIM: MSG), the AIM and Social Stock Exchange quoted provider of digital media, technology and social impact solutions announces that Black Cactus Holdings, its joint venture partner in Nexstar, a subsidiary of Milestone, has launched a KYC (Know your customer) and AML (Anti Money Laundering) platform.  The new platform is part of a fintech solution designed to be used by those organisations involved in banking, gaming, insurance and card programmes amongst others. The platform ties into a number of major global databases to carry out background checks on both individuals and Corporates, these include criminal records, financial & personal history, sex offender registries, employment and payroll services databases, insurance and all other KYC and AML requirements. The new KYC and AML platform has been developed to significantly reduce the processing time for each full background check application from weeks to days, making it more business responsive. The release of the product to the UK and European marketplace via Nexstar is to be accompanied by a marketing campaign commencing on 1st July 2017 with a mobile version scheduled to be released in August 2017, this will embed biometric capabilities and computer vision for facial recognition. Nexstar will charge clients a fee per case processed and an ongoing monthly fee, which will be determined separately for each client offering the Company an opportunity for immediate revenue generation. The KYC platform has been designed to work on traditional banking and financial systems as well as new fintech technologies with a strong bias towards blockchain, hyperledger, cryptocurrency and internet of things following several years of development. The product has been in development and pre-release in North America for the past year, and has been used by over 200 companies as part of that process. A list of these companies can be found at https://www.blackcactusholdings.com/kyc-aml This platform has initially been created for the fintech sector, but with increased concerns over global security, is a landmark development bringing security checks and KYC into a real-time capability for all sectors, substantially expanding our potential market base for the product. Deborah White, CEO of Milestone commented: "The KYC platform, which will be marketed by Milestone Group and its subsidiary Nexstar is a significant leap forward for organisations globally keen to have the KYC processing time brought down from the current average of 3 weeks. Having the ability to process this in a matter of minutes, safe in the knowledge that the time reduction has also been made more secure through the use of hyper ledger, is expected to interest many organisations globally." About KYC Know Your Customer (KYC) is the process of a business identifying the identity of its clients. The term is also used to refer to the bank and anti-money laundering regulations that govern these activities. The objectives of KYC guidelines are to prevent banks from being intentionally or unintentionally used by criminal elements for money laundering activities.  About Nexstar Nexstar, a joint venture entity between Milestone and Black Cactus, is a technology provider delivering fintech, blockchain, hyperledger, cryptocurrency and digital entertainment solutions. The Nexstar platform is designed to meet the needs of clients, offering access to unique financial technology, which has global regulatory as well as transactional (downloadable) content from a number of global providers. This announcement contains inside information for the purposes of Article 7 of EU Regulation 596/2014. For further information:  Milestone Group PLC     Deborah White, Chief Executive  Tel: 0207 929 7826        Cairn Financial Advisers LLP, Nominated Adviser     Liam Murray/Sandy Jamieson  Tel: 0207 213 0880        Hybridan LLP, Broker     Claire Louise Noyce  Tel: 0203 764 2341        Walbrook PR Limited, PR     Gary Middleton/Paul Cornelius/Paul Whittington  Tel: 0207 933 8780  This announcement is distributed by Nasdaq Corporate Solutions on behalf of Nasdaq Corporate Solutions clients.The issuer of this announcement warrants that they are solely responsible for the content, accuracy and originality of the information contained therein.Source: Milestone Group PLC via Globenewswire



Close


 

 















 






 



London Stock Exchange plc is not responsible for and does not check content on this Website. Website users are responsible for checking content. Any news item (including any prospectus) which is addressed solely to the persons and countries specified therein should not be relied upon other than by such persons and/or outside the specified countries. Terms and conditions, including restrictions on use and distribution apply.



©2014 London Stock Exchange plc. All rights reserved



 
Milestone Group PLC : Launch of New KYC Platform - RNS











 


Milestone Group - Wikipedia





















 






Milestone Group

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






This article contains content that is written like an advertisement. Please help improve it by removing promotional content and inappropriate external links, and by adding encyclopedic content written from a neutral point of view. (February 2016) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)



Milestone Group PLC


Type

Public Limited Company


Traded as
AIM:MSG


Industry



Digital Media
Technology





Founded
6 March 2003 (2003-03-06)


Headquarters
London, United Kingdom


Products



The Passion Project
Winning in the Game of Life™
OnGuard
OnSide





Subsidiaries



Relative
Mobile Business Solutions
Nexstar
Disorder Magazine





Website
milestonegroup.co.uk


Milestone Group plc (a.k.a. Milestone) is a British Digital Media and Technology company. Originally a cross media proprietor with holdings in radio, publishing and television, the company now focuses on the digital media and technology sector.[1]
Milestone has built a range of products and services that cover a range of activities including education, training and publishing. Its flagship product, the Passion Project, has been designed to create a holistic approach to careers advice for young people, involving over 100 organisations across the profit, not-for-profit and third sector. A by-product of the Passion Project’s process is the creation of a social marketplace for its partners. The resulting ecosystem offers a range of commercial and social impact opportunities for the company and its network of clients.[2]
The company is based in London and is a constituent of the FTSE AIM All-Share Index division of the Alternative Investment Market.



Contents


1 History

1.1 Events

1.1.1 2008
1.1.2 2009
1.1.3 2011
1.1.4 2012
1.1.5 2013
1.1.6 2014
1.1.7 2015




2 Products and Subsidiaries

2.1 Oil Productions Ltd t/a Relative
2.2 The Passion Project
2.3 Disorder Magazine
2.4 Winning in the Game of Life
2.5 Nexstar
2.6 Mobile Business Solutions


3 Corporate Social Responsibility
4 Former Holdings

4.1 Television channels
4.2 Radio stations
4.3 Newspapers & Magazines


5 External links
6 References



History[edit]
Events[edit]
Since Milestone’s admission to the AIM on 1 July 2003, the company has progressed from a radio, publishing and television provider[3] to a digital media and technology company. The following events mark that progression:
2008[edit]

A new Board was formed headed by CEO, Deborah White.

2009[edit]

Milestone entered into an agreement with privately owned American Technology firm, JumpStart Wireless Corporation, obtaining the rights to sell patented and patent pending technologies of Jumpstart in the UK.[4]

2011[edit]

Acquisition of Oil Productions Ltd[5][6] and the development of OnSide.
Milestone’s subsidiary Oil Productions was awarded a contract to deliver a digital art competition for Infiniti.[7]

2012[edit]

Paul Elliott CBE was appointed Milestone’s Sports and Corporate Social Responsibility Ambassador, bringing his “expertise in community and corporate social responsibility, both locally and nationally” to the company.[8]

2013[edit]

Milestone launched its flagship product, the Passion Project, with the aim to inspire and empower young people and tackle youth unemployment.[9]
Milestone piloted its Winning in the Game of Life™ product in Primary Schools, meeting the UK curriculum for Spiritual, Moral, Social and Cultural education, and developed the OnGuard product which went live with Charlton Athletic FC’s Community Trust.[10]
The Milestone Foundation was established, a charitable foundation used to underpin the Passion Project and aid the delivery of successful outcomes for young people.

2014[edit]

Milestone acquired Disorder Magazine, which showcases young talent whilst providing training for young people.
Milestone’s subsidiary Oil Productions was awarded a contract to deliver the construction of a microsite for the Animals Asia Foundation.[11]

2015[edit]

Milestone formed a joint venture company, “Nexstar”, with Black Cactus Holdings Pty Ltd.[12] Nexstar was originally launched for the loyalty and rewards sector, but has since expanded to include a range of services including music, film, TV and apps. It was agreed that Nexstar would syndicate content from Disorder Magazine.[13]

Products and Subsidiaries[edit]
According to their respective websites, Milestone Group PLC and its subsidiaries offer a number of products and services to its clients. These include:
Oil Productions Ltd t/a Relative[edit]
A creative agency specialising in the creation of digital experiences and brand activations.[clarification needed]
The Passion Project[edit]
A social engagement programme established to tackle youth unemployment.
Disorder Magazine[edit]
A fashion and music-orientated youth magazine.
Winning in the Game of Life[edit]
An educational programme designed to develop the emotional intelligence of school-aged children.
Nexstar[edit]
A technology provider, delivering solutions to industry leaders[who?] within the employee recognition, employee performance, customer loyalty and reward and product promotions market segments.
Mobile Business Solutions[edit]
A provider of mobile management tools incorporating:

OnSide – A mobile-managed monitoring tool for sports organisations.
OnGuard – A mobile-managed reporting tool used within the security and man-guarding sectors.

Corporate Social Responsibility[edit]
In 2013, Milestone Group established the Milestone Foundation, a charitable foundation created to underpin a series of social initiatives and leverage the group’s expertise to maximise commercial and social value. Its flagship product is the Passion Project.[14]
Its trustees include:[15]

Kevin Everett, Charitable Lead
Prof Lord Patel of Bradford
Lord Kennedy, Baron of Southwark
Cmdr Chris Waite
Paul Elliott CBE
Wilf Pickles
Richard Evans
Deborah White

Former Holdings[edit]
Television channels[edit]
The Milestone Group had one television channel:

Six TV (originally The Oxford Channel; operated through Oxford Broadcasting) - was a "free-to-air" channel available in Oxford and Southampton. It closed in 2009.[16]

Radio stations[edit]
The Milestone Group used to outright own three local radio stations in the UK under the Passion Radio branding. One was sold between 2005 & 2006, while the other two were shut down:

Passion 107.9 - local radio station for the Oxfordshire area (Now under the ownership of Passion Radio (Oxford) Limited; now known as Jack FM 2 Oxfordshire, but referred to on-air as "Jack 2").
Fusion 107.3 - local radio station for Lewisham (and, on-air, Bromley and Croydon) (Sold to Sunrise Radio Group & re-branded "Time 107.3", then "South London Radio"; ceased operations 4 April 2009)
Millenium 106.8 - local radio stations for the Thamesmead area (Eventually taken over by Fusion Radio Holdings, who then re-branded it as "Time 106.8", then was sold to Sunrise Radio Group; ceased operations 4 April 2009)

It also held stake in four other radio stations alongside the stations' other investors. Eventually, Milestone's stake in these was sold off between 2005 & 2006:

Kestrel FM (54%) - local radio station for Basingstoke and the surrounding area of north Hampshire. (Sold to the Tindle Radio Group, then Celador; now known as The Breeze (Basingstoke)
Kick FM (51%) - local radio station for West Berkshire, broadcast from Newbury. (Sold to the Tindle Radio Group, then Andover Sound, then eventually Celador; now known as The Breeze (Newbury).)
Reading 107 FM (37%) - local radio station for the Reading area of Berkshire (originally owned by a consortium, then taken over by Guardian Media Group, before finally sold to Madejski Communications Ltd.; now known as 107 JACK FM (Berkshire))
107.1 Rugby FM (52%) - local radio station for the Rugby area of Warwickshire (Sold to CN Group, then Quidem).

Newspapers & Magazines[edit]
The Milestone Group used to own multiple publications through its former Tri-Media Publishing subsidiary, ten of them under the Courier Newspapers brand:

Auto Weekly - information on the buying and selling of cars in Oxfordshire.
Breakout! - published immediately before school holidays, a publication distributed in primary schools to children.
South Oxfordshire Courier - free newspaper for southern Oxfordshire, formerly "Courier Journal".
Oxford Journal - free newspaper for northern and central Oxfordshire, formerly "Oxford City Journal".
Oxfordshire Living - free monthly publication distributed in Oxfordshire.
Property Weekly - free publication advertising property for sale in Oxfordshire.
Oxford Courier - free newspaper for Oxfordshire
Thames Valley Life - monthly lifestyle magazine for Thames Valley
Basingstoke Property Weekly - weekly supplement distributed with the Basingstoke Observer by real estate agents in northern Hampshire.
West Berkshire News - free newspaper for West Berkshire.

Another was operated in association with then local radio station Kestrel FM in 2000:

Basingstoke Observer - local free newspaper in Basingstoke

Auto Weekly & Property Weekly are currently owned by The Oxfordshire Guardian Group, operated in conjunction with the Oxfordshire Guardan.
The South Oxfordshire Courier, after coming under the ownership of the paper's managing director in 2006, was retired in 2008 in favor of the branding of its sister publication, the Oxford Journal, which itself was retired soon afterwards, before being re-launched in 2012 under Taylor Newspapers, but was once again retired for the second & final time in 2014 in favor of an extension to the Oxfordshire Guardian.
Breakout!, Oxfordshire Living, Oxford Courier, Thames Valley Life, & Basingstoke Property Weekly are no longer published.
Basingstoke Observer was sold in a management buyout in September 2006. Following several changes in ownership, it now operates under the ownership of Taylor Newspapers. In June 2015, the Observer brand was extended to publications in Newbury & Thatcham.
External links[edit]

Milestone Group PLC official website

References[edit]

^ "Milestone completes a rebranding". Shareview. 19 June 2012. 
^ "Milestone passionate on adding social and shareholder value". ProactiveInvestors. 11 December 2014. 
^ "First day of dealings". Trustnet. 1 July 2003. 
^ "Milestone Invests In Florida Based wireless technology firm and agrees UK Distribution Deal". ProactiveInvestors. 8 October 2009. 
^ "Milestone Group acquires Oil Productions". Enforbusiness. Retrieved 6 January 2016. 
^ "Acquisition of Oil Productions Limited". Investegate. 15 August 2011. 
^ "Milestone Group wins "significant" digital art contract". ProactiveInvestors. 24 November 2011. 
^ "Former Chelsea captain Elliott OnSide with Milestone Group". ProactiveInvestors. 6 September 2012. 
^ "Milestone launches social engagement programme". The Telegraph Investor. 29 January 2013. 
^ "Milestone Group's OnSide product goes live with Charlton Athletic Community Trust". ProactiveInvestors. 23 January 2013. 
^ "Milestone Group subsidiary wins animal welfare micro-site gig". ProactiveInvestors. 22 April 2014. 
^ "Milestone's Joint Venture, "Nexstar", signs first contract". ProactiveInvestors. 5 October 2015. 
^ "MSG agrees to licence Disorder Content to Nexstar". InteractiveInvestor. 16 December 2015. 
^ "Milestone passionate on adding social and shareholder value". ProactiveInvestors. 11 December 2014. 
^ "Milestone appoints trustees for Passion Project charity". ProactiveInvestors. 10 July 2014. 
^ Oxford Mail





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Milestone_Group&oldid=737107406"					
Categories: Newspaper companies of the United KingdomHidden categories: Articles with a promotional tone from February 2016All articles with a promotional toneWikipedia articles needing clarification from February 2016All articles with specifically marked weasel-worded phrasesArticles with specifically marked weasel-worded phrases from February 2016 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 31 August 2016, at 20:15.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 










Yahoo!奇摩關鍵字廣告-刊登關鍵字廣告

















 


Yahoo!奇摩首頁
        | 登入Bing
        | 登入YAM


 




Yahoo!奇摩關鍵字廣告-最新優惠

Yahoo!奇摩關鍵字廣告-原生廣告專區

原生廣告介紹
常見問題
經銷商招募


Yahoo!奇摩關鍵字廣告-什麼是關鍵字廣告
Yahoo!奇摩關鍵字廣告-廣告版位
Yahoo!奇摩關鍵字廣告-如何計費
Yahoo!奇摩關鍵字廣告-常見問題


Yahoo!奇摩關鍵字廣告-成功案例



 



 













超值關鍵字行銷方案
（連續60天曝光，每日預算500元）
免費享有：

帳戶顧問專業建議
專業文案編輯3次(價值6千元)
安裝成效追蹤碼
最新優惠訊息






入門方案
（30天曝光，每日預算800元）
免費享有：

新手優化手冊
專業文案編輯1次





 - 





點此查看網站規範

立即完成註冊
































經銷商專區 | 
隱私權政策  | 

廣告客戶服務條款  | 
廣告規範 

雅虎數位行銷 版權所有 © 2017 Yahoo Digital Marketing. All Rights Reserved.






























Milestone Group PLC : Launch of New KYC Platform | Milestone Group PLC (MSG) | RNS Company Announcements | Equities  | FE Trustnet

























 


















Trustnet








Login


















To continue using this website, please tell us a  little about yourself:
 I am a financial adviser
 I am a discretionary fund manager / multimanager
 I am a financial paraplanner
 I work in financial services
 I am a private investor


   This site uses cookies.  Some of the cookies are essential for parts of the site to operate and have already been set.  
   You may delete and block all cookies from this site, but if you do, parts of the site may not work.  To find out more 
   about cookies on the website and how to delete cookies, see our Privacy and Cookie Policy.
   
 I accept the FE Trustnet cookie policy


Continue

For more information Click here






Investments

Unit Trusts & OEICs

Unit Trusts & OEICs Home
Prices & Performance
Multi-manager & Mixed Asset
Special Reports
UT&OEIC Ratings
A-Z Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Funds Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


IA Unit Trusts & OEICs

IA Unit Trusts & OEICs Home
Prices & Performance
Multi-manager & Mixed Asset
Special Reports
IA UT&OEIC Ratings
A-Z Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Funds Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Equities

Equities Home
Prices & Performance
A-Z Equity Factsheets
Latest announcements


Investment Trusts

Investment Trusts Home
Prices & Performance
Investment Trust Ratings
A-Z Investment Trust Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Warrants
A-Z Sectors
Split Capital Analytics
Investment Trust Guide
Most viewed investment trusts
Most viewed groups


Pensions

Pensions Home
Prices & Performance
Pension Fund Ratings
A-Z Pension Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Pension Product Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Life

Life Home
Prices & Performance
A-Z Life Fund Ratings
A-Z Life Fund Factsheets
A-Z Life Group Factsheets
A-Z Life Product Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Life insurance glossary
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Offshore Funds

Offshore Funds Home
Prices & Performance
Offshore Fund Ratings
A-Z Offshore Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Offshore Funds Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


ETFs

ETFs Home
ETF Prices & Performance
ETF Fund Ratings
A-Z ETF Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
ETFs Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


VCTs

VCTs Home
VCT Prices & Performance
A-Z VCT Factsheets
VCTs Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Structured Products

Structured Products Home
A-Z Structured Product Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
Structured products guide
Structured products glossary




Fund Managers

Fund Managers Home
Alpha managers
League table 
A-Z manager factsheets 


News & Research

News & Research Home
News Archive
Education guides

Education guides home
Emerging Market

ETFs
Unit Trust & OEIC

Investment trust


                                Offshore funds 
ISAs 


FE Trustnet Videos 
Bright-talk Videos 


Learning

Learn about investing
Investment basics

Pensions
Investing in a fund
Investment trusts
Exchange
                                Traded Funds (ETFs)
Passive funds
                                and trackers
What is an ISA?


What to invest in?

Bonds
Equities
Property
Commodities


Where to invest?

UK
US
Europe
Emerging markets
Asia


How to invest?


                                Setting objectives for your portfolio
Asset allocation
                                - the basics
Measuring performance

                                Onshore and offshore - what’s the difference


Fund ratings

About FE Ratings
FE Crown Fund Ratings
FE Passive Fund Ratings
FE Alpha Manager
                                Ratings
FE Risk Scores
The Adviser Fund
                                Index




Portfolio

Portfolio Home
Watchlist
Alerts


Tools

Home
Fundswire

Fundswire Home
Manage my alerts


Charting
Find an IFA
Pension Calculator
IFA tools

IFA tools home
FE AFI
Client Fund Profiler
Structured Products
Whitelabel Factsheets




Passive FundsNew

Passive Funds Homepage
Sectors

UK Equities
North American Equities
European Equities
Japanese Equities
Emerging Market Equities
UK Gilts
Property
Sterling Corporate Bonds
Index-Linked Gilts









Reading List




Clear all list



0


Your Basket


Aberdeen Global Indian Equity D2 GBP 





Open basket


















Login







Select Account..




Login
 Remember Me

Password Reminder
Not Registered? Click Here







Register





*

*

*



*


*

Choose a User Type
I am a financial adviser
I am a discretionary fund manager / multimanager
I am a financial paraplanner
I work in financial services
I am a private investor

*
 I accept your terms of use
 Send me FE Trustnet bulletins
Register





It's look like you're leaving us

            What would you like us to do with the funds you've selected
        
Show me all my options
        Forget them
        Save them 

            Remember my choice











        Customise this table













Company
EPIC/TIDM
SEDOL/ISIN
































Share


Tweet






 
                    Print   
                     
                    RSS





Milestone Group PLC (MSG)



Milestone Group PLC

Milestone Group PLC : Launch of New KYC Platform
Milestone Group PLC : Launch of New KYC PlatformMILESTONE GROUP PLC("Milestone" or the "Company") Launch of New KYC PlatformMilestone (AIM: MSG), the AIM and Social Stock Exchange quoted provider of digital media, technology and social impact solutions announces that Black Cactus Holdings, its joint venture partner in Nexstar, a subsidiary of Milestone, has launched a KYC (Know your customer) and AML (Anti Money Laundering) platform. The new platform is part of a fintech solution designed to be used by those organisations involved in banking, gaming, insurance and card programmes amongst others. The platform ties into a number of major global databases to carry out background checks on both individuals and Corporates, these include criminal records, financial & personal history, sex offender registries, employment and payroll services databases, insurance and all other KYC and AML requirements.The new KYC and AML platform has been developed to significantly reduce the processing time for each full background check application from weeks to days, making it more business responsive.The release of the product to the UK and European marketplace via Nexstar is to be accompanied by a marketing campaign commencing on 1st July 2017 with a mobile version scheduled to be released in August 2017, this will embed biometric capabilities and computer vision for facial recognition. Nexstar will charge clients a fee per case processed and an ongoing monthly fee, which will be determined separately for each client offering the Company an opportunity for immediate revenue generation.The KYC platform has been designed to work on traditional banking and financial systems as well as new fintech technologies with a strong bias towards blockchain, hyperledger, cryptocurrency and internet of things following several years of development.The product has been in development and pre-release in North America for the past year, and has been used by over 200 companies as part of that process. A list of these companies can be found at https://www.blackcactusholdings.com/kyc-amlThis platform has initially been created for the fintech sector, but with increased concerns over global security, is a landmark development bringing security checks and KYC into a real-time capability for all sectors, substantially expanding our potential market base for the product.Deborah White, CEO of Milestone commented:"The KYC platform, which will be marketed by Milestone Group and its subsidiary Nexstar is a significant leap forward for organisations globally keen to have the KYC processing time brought down from the current average of 3 weeks. Having the ability to process this in a matter of minutes, safe in the knowledge that the time reduction has also been made more secure through the use of hyper ledger, is expected to interest many organisations globally."About KYCKnow Your Customer (KYC) is the process of a business identifying the identity of its clients. The term is also used to refer to the bank and anti-money laundering regulations that govern these activities. The objectives of KYC guidelines are to prevent banks from being intentionally or unintentionally used by criminal elements for money laundering activities. About NexstarNexstar, a joint venture entity between Milestone and Black Cactus, is a technology provider delivering fintech, blockchain, hyperledger, cryptocurrency and digital entertainment solutions. The Nexstar platform is designed to meet the needs of clients, offering access to unique financial technology, which has global regulatory as well as transactional (downloadable) content from a number of global providers.This announcement contains inside information for the purposes of Article 7 of EU Regulation 596/2014.For further information:Milestone Group PLC  Deborah White, Chief Executive  Tel: 0207 929 7826   Cairn Financial Advisers LLP, Nominated Adviser  Liam Murray/Sandy Jamieson  Tel: 0207 213 0880   Hybridan LLP, Broker    Claire Louise Noyce  Tel: 0203 764 2341       Walbrook PR Limited, PR    Gary Middleton/Paul Cornelius/Paul Whittington  Tel: 0207 933 8780 This announcement is distributed by Nasdaq Corporate Solutions on behalf of Nasdaq Corporate Solutions clients.The issuer of this announcement warrants that they are solely responsible for the content, accuracy and originality of the information contained therein.Source: Milestone Group PLC via Globenewswire











quick links
Equity Home
Equity Prices and Performance
Latest announcements


our product portfolio
www.trustnet.com
www.trustnetoffshore.com
www.trustnetmiddleeast.com


 
www.investegate.co.uk
www.fundlistings.com
FE Analytics


 
Data feeds
Factsheet and literature Production
Webtools










Data provided by FE. Care has been taken to ensure that the information is correct, but FE neither warrants, represents nor guarantees the contents of information, nor does it accept any responsibility for errors, inaccuracies, omissions or any inconsistencies herein. Past performance does not predict future performance, it should not be the main or sole reason for making an investment decision. The value of investments and any income from them can fall as well as rise.



Login
Help
Contact Us









For Equity investors
FE Investegate
For Private investors
Trustnet Direct
For Professional investors
FE Invest
FE Analytics
FE Data feeds
FE Fund listings
For International investors
FE Trustnet Hong Kong
FE Trustnet Offshore
FE Trustnet Middle East


Quick links
Trustnet-Magazine
Investment research
FE Trustnet videos
Top rated funds
Top performing funds
Find a fund
Build a portfolio
The UK’s best fund managers
Performance charting
About us


Fund performance
IA unit trusts & OEICs
Equities
Investment trusts
Pension funds
Life funds
Offshore funds
ETFs
Venture capital trusts


Stay connected with FE Trustnet






Trustnet mobile website















LATEST :
Five reasons to keep hold of your defensive funds
13:00 | Monday, January 20, 2014






You are currently using an old browser which will not be supported by Trustnet after 31/07/2016.  To ensure you benefit from all features on the site, please update your browser.   Close 






















                © Trustnet Limited 2017. All Rights Reserved.
                Please read our Terms of Use / Disclaimer and Privacy and
                    Cookie Policy.
                Data supplied in conjunction with Thomson Financial Limited, London Stock Exchange
                Plc, StructuredRetailProducts.com and ManorPark.com
















FE Investegate |Milestone Group PLC Announcements | Milestone Group PLC: Milestone Group PLC : Half-yearly report























We use cookies on our website. If you continue to browse our website without taking any action, we will assume that you are happy to receive all cookies from our website.
Read More Dismiss


Financial Express (Holdings) Limited (“we”, “our”, “us” and derivatives) are committed to protecting and respecting your privacy. This Privacy Policy, together with our Terms of Use, sets out the basis on which any personal data that we collect from you, or that you provide to us, will be processed by us relating to your use of any of the below websites (“sites”).

FEAnalytics.com
FEInvest.net
FETransmission.com
Investegate.co.uk
Trustnet.hk
Trustnetoffshore.com
Trustnetmiddleeast.com

For the purposes of the Data Protection Act 1998, the data controller is Trustnet Limited of 2nd Floor, Golden House, 30 Great Pulteney Street, London, W1F 9NN. Our nominated representative for the purpose of this Act is Kirsty Witter.
WHAT INFORMATION DO WE COLLECT ABOUT YOU?
We collect information about you when you register with us or use any of our websites / services. Part of the registration process may include entering personal details & details of your investments.
We may collect information about your computer, including where available your operating system, browser version, domain name and IP address and details of the website that you came from, in order to improve this site.
You confirm that all information you supply is accurate.
COOKIES
In order to provide personalised services to and analyse site traffic, we may use a cookie file which is stored on your browser or the hard drive of your computer. Some of the cookies we use are essential for the sites to operate and may be used to deliver you different content, depending on the type of investor you are. 
You can block cookies by activating the setting on your browser which allows you to refuse the setting of all or some cookies. However, if you use your browser settings to block all cookies (including essential cookies) you may not be able to access all or part of our sites. Unless you have adjusted your browser setting so that it will refuse cookies, our system will issue cookies as soon as you visit our sites.
HOW WE USE INFORMATION
We store and use information you provide as follows:

to present content effectively;
to provide you with information, products or services that you request from us or which may interest you, tailored to your specific interests, where you have consented to be contacted for such purposes;
to carry out our obligations arising from any contracts between you and us;
to enable you to participate in interactive features of our service, when you choose to do so;
to notify you about changes to our service;
to improve our content by tracking group information that describes the habits, usage, patterns and demographics of our customers.

We may also send you emails to provide information and keep you up to date with developments on our sites. It is our policy to have instructions on how to unsubscribe so that you will not receive any future e-mails. You can change your e-mail address at any time.
In order to provide support on the usage of our tools, our support team need access to all information provided in relation to the tool.
We will not disclose your name, email address or postal address or any data that could identify you to any third party without first receiving your permission.
However, you agree that we may disclose to any regulatory authority to which we are subject and to any investment exchange on which we may deal or to its related clearing house (or to investigators, inspectors or agents appointed by them), or to any person empowered to require such information by or under any legal enactment, any information they may request or require relating to you, or if relevant, any of your clients.
You agree that we may pass on information obtained under Money Laundering legislation as we consider necessary to comply with reporting requirements under such legislation.
ACCESS TO YOUR INFORMATION AND CORRECTION
We want to ensure that the personal information we hold about you is accurate and up to date. You may ask us to correct or remove information that is inaccurate.
You have the right under data protection legislation to access information held about you. If you wish to receive a copy of any personal information we hold, please write to us at 3rd Floor, Hollywood House, Church Street East, Woking, GU21 6HJ. Any access request may be subject to a fee of £10 to meet our costs in providing you with details of the information we hold about you.
WHERE WE STORE YOUR PERSONAL DATA
The data that we collect from you may be transferred to, and stored at, a destination outside the European Economic Area (“EEA”). It may be processed by staff operating outside the EEA who work for us or for one of our suppliers. Such staff may be engaged in, amongst other things, the provision of support services. By submitting your personal data, you agree to this transfer, storing and processing. We will take all steps reasonably necessary, including the use of encryption, to ensure that your data is treated securely and in accordance with this privacy policy.
Unfortunately, the transmission of information via the internet is not completely secure. Although we will do our best to protect your personal data, we cannot guarantee the security of your data transmitted to our sites; any transmission is at your own risk. You will not hold us responsible for any breach of security unless we have been negligent or in wilful default.
CHANGES TO OUR PRIVACY POLICY
Any changes we make to our privacy policy in the future will be posted on this page and, where appropriate, notified to you by e-mail.
OTHER WEBSITES
Our sites contain links to other websites. If you follow a link to any of these websites, please note that these websites have their own privacy policies and that we do not accept any responsibility or liability for these policies. Please check these policies before you submit any personal data to these websites.
CONTACT
If you want more information or have any questions or comments relating to our privacy policy please email [email protected] in the first instance.







FE Trustnet UK  |  FE Trustnet Offshore  |  FE Trustnet Hong Kong  |  FE Trustnet Middle East  |  FE Analytics  |  FE Fundlistings


 Rss  |  About Us  |  Contact Us  |  Help





 



Company announcements
Company news
FE Trustnet Fundswire







Today's announcements
Most read announcements
Announcements archive
Advanced search





 Email address
 Password
  Register
|
 Login











 Information
 X 


Enter a valid email address


 Show me how to log in	  Forgot password?











Keyword
Company
EPIC/TIDM
SEDOL/ISIN
News





















Price
Announcements
Fundamentals
News
Article
RSS





Milestone Group PLC (MSG)


Add to Alerts list








 
                    Print   
                     
                    Mail a friend
                
                   
                     
                    Annual reports





Friday 30 June, 2017


Milestone Group PLC
Milestone Group PLC : Half-yearly report
Milestone Group PLC : Half-yearly reportMILESTONE GROUP PLC("Milestone" or the "Company")HALF YEARLY REPORTMilestone Group PLC ("Milestone" or the "Company"), the AIM quoted (AIM: MSG) provider of digital media and technology solutions, announces its half yearly report for the six months ended 31 March 2017.Highlights Nexstar JV distributes first Independent Film, Brash Young TurksNexstar expanded offering to include BankHubPost period, Nexstar launches KYC / AML platformCooperation agreement signed with the Social Stock ExchangeLaunch of unique Alchemy digital media platform at the Apprenticeships 4 England eventLaunch of Alchemy TV, 24/7 online over-the-top TV streaming service OnGuard contract renewals and extensions agreed £748,720 raised through Equity Issues during the period and £305,000 since the period endBoard taking action to recover £1.25m from the Company sourced placee from October 2016 placingDeborah White, Chief Executive, said: "The last six months have been the most challenging during my time at Milestone, however the opportunities made available via Nexstar's innovative and disruptive technology applications continue to attract attention from a growing number of market sectors. With additional sales and marketing resources to support the Company's revised strategic focus it is only a matter of time before their revenue potential becomes apparent and the results of our efforts from 2016 begin to manifest."For further information:Milestone Group PLCDeborah White, Chief Executive                        Tel: 020 7929 7826Cairn Financial Advisers LLP, Nominated AdviserLiam Murray / Sandy Jamieson                          Tel: 020 7213 0880Hybridan LLP, BrokerClaire Louise Noyce                                   Tel: 020 3764 2341Walbrook PR Limited, PRGary Middleton / Paul Cornelius / Paul Whittington    Tel: 020 7933 8780CHIEF EXECUTIVE'S STATEMENTThe last six months have been the most challenging during my time at Milestone. The positive developments and industry momentum built during the course of 2016 were halted abruptly in Q4 2016 when £1.25 million of funding failed to materialise from the Company sourced placee. This funding was needed to on-board additional sales and marketing resources and was key to the future expansion of the Company. The failure to bring in the additional resource put additional pressure on a small team and slowed the development of revenues across the board. The Company has since concentrated its efforts on seeking an effective resolution to the matter, reducing its cost base and supporting the development of its subsidiary, Nexstar's growing suite of products and services. Post end of period the Company has taken the opportunity to review its strategy and has resolved to reposition the primary focus of the business towards the provision of technology products primarily within the Financial Services and Media arena. As such it will be reducing focus on some of its legacy business areas including Passion Project.Nexstar Nexstar has a clearly defined development roadmap in media and fintech. The existing media development continues to gain momentum with Brash Young Turks the first independent film distributed through services such as Amazon Prime. A growing selection of music artists are using its products and services with a new version of the music-publishing platform in development, which will allow artists to self-publish. We fully expect a good take-up of these platforms as word of their efficiency and costs savings filters round the sector and we build a marketing team. The historical commerce contracts have been brought back on track with additional services from the newly released virtual banking suite now being added to the services required.  The joint venture continues to expand its product offering with BankHub, the cash management platform announced in the 30 March 2017 Annual General Meeting Statement, going live during the period followed by the more recent announcement of a Know Your Customer / Anti-Money Laundering application. Additional complimentary developments will be announced soon. Passion ProjectDuring the period, the Passion Project signed a co-operation agreement with the Social Stock Exchange and a strategic partnership agreement with the Royal College of Arts to work on the Social Design of the Passion Project initiative. These agreements demonstrate that the commercial opportunities, made possible through cross-sector collaboration combined with the potential social outcomes of the Passion Project, are of interest to the marketplace. This distribution network offers a significant commercial distribution opportunity to the developing suite of products made available via Nexstar. Milestone FoundationDivert, a youth engagement initiative operated by the Milestone Foundation in collaboration with the Metropolitan Police is currently operating in two London Boroughs. The operation and staffing of this initiative is now fully funded for the next 12 months by successful grant applications, with further funding being sought to expand across all 32 London Boroughs.AlchemyThe Alchemy platform was well received at the Apprenticeships 4 England launch event in January 2017 and continues to attract attention from charities and corporate clients. The platform is a commercial product designed to support the Passion Project partner network, showcase social initiatives and engage commercial consumers for the Company's products and services.Active discussions are ongoing with a number of corporate clients interested in using the product for Corporate Social Responsibility initiatives and staff engagement and a growing number of charitable enquiries are developing as a result. OnGuardThe OnGuard platform products continue to grow in terms of user base, with three contract renewals and extensions during the period. In January 2017, our security services client in Manchester renewed their agreement for a further 12 months, also increasing the contract value three-fold. Renewals and annual payments were also received after the period for STM Cleaning and Charlton Athletic Community Trust.The platform has also been introduced in the management of Divert.Disorder MagazineFollowing his appointment as Editor in April 2016, Oliver Horton has delivered on his task of  rebuilding the Disorder brand and increasing readership numbers, as well as delivering a consistent product to the marketplace that could be sold both in hard copy and digitally. Winning in the Game of LifeWinning in the Game of Life has had successful results from the 100 schools project with consistent feedback supporting the value of the materials in delivering improvement in educational learning and behavioural issues. The focus has been on attracting a distribution partner in the educational sector to take the product to market and support the development of Level 2. A version of this material for young people is also being made available through the Passion Project for trial with the participants of Divert.Management ChangesThe Board are making a number of management changes to strengthen and support the refocus of the Company's operational and commercial activities. In February 2017, David Hill resigned from his position as Non-Executive Director following six years with the Company. The Board are in the process of appointing a replacement and are in active discussions with additional key personnel in support of the revised strategy that are anticipated to be announced shortly following regulatory due diligence.FundingDuring the period, the Company continued to raise funds through the issue of shares to support the development of the business. The Company raised £1,998,720 through the issue of shares for cash and settled £45,701 of services through the issue of shares. As announced in November 2016, £1,385,000 of this cash raised did not materialise. £135,000 has subsequently settled by the Company's Broker, however £1,250,000 from the Company sourced placee remains outstanding. The Board continues to seek a resolution to this situation and expect to provide an update in the near future. The Company continues to carefully manage its working capital position and is currently considering a number of funding opportunities. Further announcements will be made in due course.OutlookMoving forward, the opportunities made available via Nexstar's innovative and disruptive technology applications continue to attract attention from a growing number of market sectors. With additional sales and marketing resources to support the Company's revised strategic focus it is only a matter of time before their revenue potential becomes apparent and the results of our efforts from 2016 begin to manifest.Deborah WhiteChief Executive OfficerCONSOLIDATED STATEMENT OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME Unauditedsix months ended 31 March 2017 £Unaudited six months ended 31 March 2016 £Audited year ended 30 Sept 2016 £ Revenue   22,272    50,408   71,359   Cost of sales    (1,964)    (12,916)    (13,856)  Gross profit 20,308 37,492 57,503  Other operating income    -    -    1,738   Administrative expenses    (1,153,253)    (780,356)    (1,820,652)            (1,152,882)(780,356)(1,818,914) Loss from operations (1,132,945) (742,864) (1,761,411)  Net Finance income/(expense)    9    7    (2,104)            Loss before taxation (1,132,936) (742,857) (1,763,515)  Taxation charge    -    -    96,245   Total comprehensive loss for the year (1,132,936) (742,857)  (1,667,270)        Attributable to equity shareholders of the parent (1,132,936) (742,857) (1,667,270) Total basic and diluted loss per share (0.12) (0.12) (0.25)There were no comprehensive income and expense items (2016: nil) other than those reflected in the above income statement. All results relate to continuing activities.CONSOLIDATED STATEMENT OF FINANCIAL POSITION    Note Unauditedsix monthsended31March 2017 £Unauditedsix monthsended31March 2016 £Auditedyearended30 Sept 2016 £Non-current assets       Intangible fixed assets     1  1  1       111 Current assets               Trade and other receivables     101,872  67,602  187,836  Unpaid called up share capital     1,250,000  -  -  Cash and cash equivalents     33,794  119,430  128,462       1,385,666187,032316,298Current liabilities             Trade and other payables     (1,346,944)  (1,942,442)  (1,201,928)  Interest-bearing loans     (163,027)  (259,647)  (134,027)       (1,509,971)(2,202,089)(1,335,955)         Net Liabilities   (124,305)(2,015,056)(1,019,656)                 Capital and reserves attributable to equity holders of the company               Share capital    4    1,082,141    625,163    783,998  Share premium account     16,831,053  13,669,203  15,073,350  Shares to be issued     29,695  609,500  63,081  Merger reserve     11,119,585  11,119,585  11,119,585  Capital Redemption Reserve     2,732,904  2,732,904  2,732,904  Retained losses     (31,919,683)  (30,771,411)  (30,792,574)   Total Equity    (124,305) (2,015,056) (1,019,656)CONSOLIDATED STATEMENT OF CASH FLOWS   Unauditedsix monthsended31 March 2017 £Unauditedsix monthsended31 March 2016 £Auditedyearended30 Sept 2016 £  Loss for the period (1,132,936) (742,857) (1,667,270)Adjustments for:           Amortisation of intangible assets  -  18,913  18,913  Net bank and other interest (income) / charges    9    7    2,104  Issue of share options / warrant charge  5,827  20,628  883,878  Services settled by the issue of shares  57,126  30,619  45,799  Net (loss) before changes in working capital (1,069,974) (672,690)  (716,576) Decrease / (increase) in trade and other receivables    85,965    (4,124)    (124,358)  Increase in trade and other payables     144,997    167,976    (572,523)   Cash from operations (839,012) (508,838) (1,413,457)   Interest received    9    7    19  Interest paid  -  -  (623)       Net cash flows from operating activities (839,003) (508,831) (1,414,061)  Financing Activities        Issue of ordinary share capital  715,335  382,646  1,424,028  Repayment of loan  (25,000)  -  (65,000)  New loans raised  54,000  153,120  91,000 Net cash flows from financing activities 744,335 535,766 1,450,028               Net increase / (decrease) in cash    (94,668)    26,935    35,967  Cash and cash equivalents at beginning of period    128,462    92,495    92,495 Cash and cash equivalents at end of period 33,794 119,430 128,462NOTES TO THE HALF YEARLY REPORT1.              General informationThe principal activity of Milestone Group PLC ("Milestone" or "the Company") and its subsidiaries (together "the Group") is the provision of multimedia and technology solutions. Milestone is the Group's ultimate parent company and is incorporated in the United Kingdom with registration number 4689130. Milestone is domiciled in the United Kingdom and has its registered office at 1st Floor, 2 Royal Exchange, London EC3V 3DG, and this is its principal place of business.Milestone's shares are quoted on the AIM market of the London Stock Exchange. Milestone's consolidated financial statements are presented in Pounds Sterling (£).This consolidated financial information has been approved for issue by the Board of Directors on 29 June 2017.  2.              Basis of preparationThe financial information in the half yearly report has been prepared using the recognition and measurement principles of International Accounting Standards, International Financial Reporting Standards and Interpretations adopted for use in the European Union (collectively Adopted IFRSs). The principal accounting policies used in preparing the half yearly report are those the Group expects to apply in its financial statements for the year ending 30 September 2017 and are unchanged from those disclosed in the Group's Directors' Report and consolidated financial statements for the year ended 30 September 2016. The financial information for the six months ended 31 March 2017 and the six months ended 31 March 2016 is unaudited and does not constitute the Group's statutory financial statements for those periods. The comparative financial information for the full year ended 30 September 2016 has, however, been derived from the audited statutory financial statements for that period. A copy of those statutory financial statements has been delivered to the Registrar of Companies. While the financial figures included in this half-yearly report have been computed in accordance with IFRSs applicable to interim periods, this half-yearly report does not contain sufficient information to constitute an interim financial report as that term is defined in IAS 34.Going concern As stated in the accounts for the year to 30 September 2016, the future business model of the Group is based around the generation of sustainable revenues and profits through strategic partnerships and joint ventures and from the Passion Project. As described in the Chief Executive's statement, progress has been and continues to be made to develop the Group's activities and associated revenues. However, as also noted in the 30 September 2016 accounts, the Group needs to raise further funds from the placing of shares whilst the revenues and profits from these solutions are fully developed. During the period the Group has raised funds of £1,998,720 through the issuing of shares for cash and settled £45,701 of services through the issue of shares. As stated in the Chairman's statement, £1,250,000 of this cash has not been received. The Board continues to seek a resolution to this situation. Since the period end further funds of £305,000 have also been raised through further share placements.In line with the plans and projections prepared by the Board, the Group's activities continue to build, however in accordance with those plans, in the short term the Group needs to continue to raise funds from a combination of trading and placement of shares to fund its activities.Loss per shareThe calculation of the basic loss per share is based on the loss attributable to ordinary shareholders divided by the average weighted number of shares in issue during the period. The calculation of diluted loss per share is based on the basic loss per share, adjusted to allow for the issue of shares and the post tax effect of dividends and interest, on the assumed conversion of all other dilutive options and other potential ordinary shares. There were 174,189,116 share options and 110,931,460 share warrants outstanding at 31 March 2017 (2016: 104,042,000 and nil), however the figures have not been adjusted to reflect conversion of these share options as the effects would be anti-dilutive.  Loss for 6 months to 31 March 2016£Weighted average number of sharesPer share amount (pence)Loss for 6 months to 31 March 2016£Weighted average number of sharesPer share amount (pence) (1,132,936)  975,529,255  (0.12)  (742,857)  607,057,128  (0.12) 4.              Share Capital  31 March2017 30 Sept2016      Number£Number£Authorised             Ordinary shares of 0.1p  2,267,095,595  2,267,096   2,267,095,595    2,267,096         2,267,095,595  2,267,096   2,267,095,595   2,267,096  Allotted, called up and fully paid             Ordinary shares of 0.1p  1,082,141,411  1,082,141  783,997,982  783,998         1,082,141,411  1,082,141  783,997,982   783,998 On 31 October 2016, the Company issued 92,333,332 ordinary shares at a price of 1.5 pence per share for a cash consideration of £1,385,000. As announced on 9 November 2016, the Company did not receive the funding. As announced on 13 December 2016 and 27 February 2017, the Company has now received £135,000 and continues to seek a resolution for the remainder. On 4 November 2016, the Company issued 48,333,334 ordinary shares at a price of 1.5 pence per share for a cash consideration of £72,500 and 4,570,093 ordinary shares at a price of 1 penny per share for the settlement of outstanding trade payables of £45,700.93.On 13 December 2016, the Company issued 196,406,670 ordinary shares at a price of 0.3 pence per share for a cash consideration of £541,220. 5.         Note to the Consolidated Statement of Cash FlowsIn addition to the cash flow statement, there is a non-cash transaction of £1,250,000 relating to the defaulting placement in October 2016. 83,333,332 ordinary shares were issued at a price of 1.5 pence per share. Funding has not been received for this share issue.6.         Availability of the Half Yearly ReportCopies of the half yearly report are available to shareholders on the Company's website at www.milestonegroup.co.uk and from Milestone's registered office: 1st Floor, 2 Royal Exchange Steps, London EC3V 3DG. This announcement is distributed by Nasdaq Corporate Solutions on behalf of Nasdaq Corporate Solutions clients.The issuer of this announcement warrants that they are solely responsible for the content, accuracy and originality of the information contained therein.Source: Milestone Group PLC via Globenewswire





























            *All intraday prices are subject to a delay of fifteen (15) minutes.

            FE Investegate takes no responsibility for the accuracy of the information within
            this site.

            The announcements are supplied by the denoted source. Queries about the content
            of an announcement should be directed to the source. FE Investegate reserves the
            right to publish a filtered set of announcements. NAV, EMM/EPT, Rule 8 and FRN Variable
            Rate Fix announcements are filtered from this site.


     ©
                2017 Financial Express. All rights reserved. Visit other
                    FE websites
                    
Go to website
FE Trustnet UK
FE Trustnet Offshore
FE Trustnet Hong Kong
FE Trustnet Middle East
FE Analytics
FE Fundlistings








 Close 


To help us provide a better service, please select the description which fits you best...

Investor with a financial adviser or broker
Investor without a financial adviser or broker
Financial adviser
Market professional (broker, banker, solicitor, etc)
Discretionary fund manager
Institutional investor



Close this window
Why are you asking me this question?





Related Instruments












 This website is for Private Investors* only

To continue using FE Investegate, please confirm that you are a private investor.

I am a private investor * I am not a private investor



    *A Private Investor is a recipient of the information who meets all of the conditions set out below, the recipient:
    1. Obtains access to the information in a personal capacity;
    2. Is not required to be regulated or supervised by a body concerned with the regulation or supervision of investment or financial services;
    3. Is not currently registered or qualified as a professional securities trader or investment adviser with any national or state exchange, regulatory authority, professional association or recognised professional body;
    4. Does not currently act in any capacity as an investment adviser, whether or not they have at some time been qualified to do so;
    5. Uses the information solely in relation to the management of their personal funds and not as a trader to the public or for the investment of corporate funds;
    6. Does not distribute, republish or otherwise provide any information or derived works to any third party in any manner or use or process information or derived works for any commercial purposes.
    







 To continue to use FE Investegate, please confirm you are a private investor

This website is only for private investors. By using this site, you agree to use the content for private use only.
Please confirm that you are a private investor using the buttons below.

I am a private investor I am not a private investor












        a d v e r t i s e m e n t






























FE Investegate |Milestone Group PLC Announcements | Milestone Group PLC: Correction: Final Results























We use cookies on our website. If you continue to browse our website without taking any action, we will assume that you are happy to receive all cookies from our website.
Read More Dismiss


Financial Express (Holdings) Limited (“we”, “our”, “us” and derivatives) are committed to protecting and respecting your privacy. This Privacy Policy, together with our Terms of Use, sets out the basis on which any personal data that we collect from you, or that you provide to us, will be processed by us relating to your use of any of the below websites (“sites”).

FEAnalytics.com
FEInvest.net
FETransmission.com
Investegate.co.uk
Trustnet.hk
Trustnetoffshore.com
Trustnetmiddleeast.com

For the purposes of the Data Protection Act 1998, the data controller is Trustnet Limited of 2nd Floor, Golden House, 30 Great Pulteney Street, London, W1F 9NN. Our nominated representative for the purpose of this Act is Kirsty Witter.
WHAT INFORMATION DO WE COLLECT ABOUT YOU?
We collect information about you when you register with us or use any of our websites / services. Part of the registration process may include entering personal details & details of your investments.
We may collect information about your computer, including where available your operating system, browser version, domain name and IP address and details of the website that you came from, in order to improve this site.
You confirm that all information you supply is accurate.
COOKIES
In order to provide personalised services to and analyse site traffic, we may use a cookie file which is stored on your browser or the hard drive of your computer. Some of the cookies we use are essential for the sites to operate and may be used to deliver you different content, depending on the type of investor you are. 
You can block cookies by activating the setting on your browser which allows you to refuse the setting of all or some cookies. However, if you use your browser settings to block all cookies (including essential cookies) you may not be able to access all or part of our sites. Unless you have adjusted your browser setting so that it will refuse cookies, our system will issue cookies as soon as you visit our sites.
HOW WE USE INFORMATION
We store and use information you provide as follows:

to present content effectively;
to provide you with information, products or services that you request from us or which may interest you, tailored to your specific interests, where you have consented to be contacted for such purposes;
to carry out our obligations arising from any contracts between you and us;
to enable you to participate in interactive features of our service, when you choose to do so;
to notify you about changes to our service;
to improve our content by tracking group information that describes the habits, usage, patterns and demographics of our customers.

We may also send you emails to provide information and keep you up to date with developments on our sites. It is our policy to have instructions on how to unsubscribe so that you will not receive any future e-mails. You can change your e-mail address at any time.
In order to provide support on the usage of our tools, our support team need access to all information provided in relation to the tool.
We will not disclose your name, email address or postal address or any data that could identify you to any third party without first receiving your permission.
However, you agree that we may disclose to any regulatory authority to which we are subject and to any investment exchange on which we may deal or to its related clearing house (or to investigators, inspectors or agents appointed by them), or to any person empowered to require such information by or under any legal enactment, any information they may request or require relating to you, or if relevant, any of your clients.
You agree that we may pass on information obtained under Money Laundering legislation as we consider necessary to comply with reporting requirements under such legislation.
ACCESS TO YOUR INFORMATION AND CORRECTION
We want to ensure that the personal information we hold about you is accurate and up to date. You may ask us to correct or remove information that is inaccurate.
You have the right under data protection legislation to access information held about you. If you wish to receive a copy of any personal information we hold, please write to us at 3rd Floor, Hollywood House, Church Street East, Woking, GU21 6HJ. Any access request may be subject to a fee of £10 to meet our costs in providing you with details of the information we hold about you.
WHERE WE STORE YOUR PERSONAL DATA
The data that we collect from you may be transferred to, and stored at, a destination outside the European Economic Area (“EEA”). It may be processed by staff operating outside the EEA who work for us or for one of our suppliers. Such staff may be engaged in, amongst other things, the provision of support services. By submitting your personal data, you agree to this transfer, storing and processing. We will take all steps reasonably necessary, including the use of encryption, to ensure that your data is treated securely and in accordance with this privacy policy.
Unfortunately, the transmission of information via the internet is not completely secure. Although we will do our best to protect your personal data, we cannot guarantee the security of your data transmitted to our sites; any transmission is at your own risk. You will not hold us responsible for any breach of security unless we have been negligent or in wilful default.
CHANGES TO OUR PRIVACY POLICY
Any changes we make to our privacy policy in the future will be posted on this page and, where appropriate, notified to you by e-mail.
OTHER WEBSITES
Our sites contain links to other websites. If you follow a link to any of these websites, please note that these websites have their own privacy policies and that we do not accept any responsibility or liability for these policies. Please check these policies before you submit any personal data to these websites.
CONTACT
If you want more information or have any questions or comments relating to our privacy policy please email [email protected] in the first instance.







FE Trustnet UK  |  FE Trustnet Offshore  |  FE Trustnet Hong Kong  |  FE Trustnet Middle East  |  FE Analytics  |  FE Fundlistings


 Rss  |  About Us  |  Contact Us  |  Help





 



Company announcements
Company news
FE Trustnet Fundswire







Today's announcements
Most read announcements
Announcements archive
Advanced search





 Email address
 Password
  Register
|
 Login











 Information
 X 


Enter a valid email address


 Show me how to log in	  Forgot password?











Keyword
Company
EPIC/TIDM
SEDOL/ISIN
News





















Price
Announcements
Fundamentals
News
Article
RSS





Milestone Group PLC (MSG)


Add to Alerts list








 
                    Print   
                     
                    Mail a friend
                
                   
                     
                    Annual reports





Tuesday 01 March, 2016


Milestone Group PLC
Correction: Final Results
Correction: Final ResultsMILESTONE GROUP PLC ("Milestone" or the "Company")Correction: Final Results The following replaces the Final Results announcement released at 7:00am on 26 February 2016 and makes corrections to the Nexstar section within the Chairman's statement.All other details in the announcement remain the same.  The full text of the amended announcement is set out below.Milestone, the AIM quoted (AIM: MSG) provider of digital media and technology solutions, announces its final results for the year ended 30 September 2015.HighlightsResearch and development work across all product ranges is all but complete and marketing has commencedPassion Project formally launched at the Cass Business School with 50 Founding partnersFee paying corporate members, sponsors and key ambassadors supporting the Passion ProjectNexstar joint venture established with Black Cactus Holdings Pty Ltd offering multiple revenue opportunitiesFirst contract signed for Nexstar with Procurement International Ltd, post year-end White-labelled version of the Nexstar Rewards site agreed with Milestone FoundationKey Personnel recruited for Passion Project and FoundationPilot of Passion Project community programmes commenced Passion Project featured in key industry eventsDevelopment of additional modules for both OnSide and OnGuardRelease of Disorder Magazine in both print and digital versionsWinning in the Game of Life ("WITGOL") being rolled out into 100 Schools, post year-endExpanded the Spirituality for Kids ("SFK") licence with the US Deborah White, CEO and Interim Chairman, commented: "The vision to build a brand synonymous with the generation of shareholder value and the creation of social change has been the raison d'etre behind the repositioning of Milestone since my joining in March 2008. Creating both a business model and a product that was a true differentiator in the media and technology marketplace was key to fulfilling that vision. I am delighted to confirm that, whilst this has taken longer than anticipated to materialise, the building blocks are now complete and key partners engaged. "This has been a year of consolidation, with the Passion Project now firmly established as our flagship product and our business model of creating shareholder value and social impact realised as a leading innovator in the commercial marketplace. This coming year will be pivotal for Milestone as we concentrate on revenue generation now that the research and development phase has been completed." For further informationMilestone Group PLC Deborah White, Chief Executive   Tel: 020 7929 7826  Cairn Financial Advisers LLP, Nominated Adviser Liam Murray / Avi Robinson     Tel: 020 7148 7900  Hybridan LLP, Broker Claire Louise Noyce     Tel: 020 3764 2341 CHAIRMAN'S STATEMENTForewordThe vision to build a brand synonymous with the generation of shareholder value and the creation of social change has been the raison d'etre behind the repositioning of Milestone since my joining in March 2008. Creating both a business model and a product that was a true differentiator in the media and technology marketplace was key to fulfilling that vision. I am delighted to confirm that, whilst this has taken longer than anticipated to materialise, the building blocks are now complete and key partners engaged.This has been a year of consolidation, with the Passion Project now firmly established as our flagship product and our business model of creating shareholder value and social impact realised as a leading innovator in the commercial marketplace. This coming year will be pivotal for Milestone as we concentrate on revenue generation now that the research and development phase has been completed.There is an ever-growing understanding of the Passion Project, its purpose and the commercial opportunities available for products and services offered by Milestone in supporting its development and delivery. The DNA of the initiative, to help young people become life ready as well as work ready, encapsulates the growing realisation and public acceptance of the need for a work force with "emotional intelligence" as well as work related skills training.Requests for the Passion Project's attendance at Industry events is a clear demonstration of acceptance and a result of significant groundwork that has been carried out behind the scenes over recent years. This is perhaps best demonstrated by the granting of Platinum sponsorship status to the Passion Project at the Annual Apprenticeship 4 England event at the Emirates Stadium, post year-end, on 25/26 February 2016.The operational team required to commercialise the initiative is in place and is industry proven. The team's knowledge of the marketplace has resulted in the Passion Project's inclusion in numerous partner bids along with being actively promoted throughout a growing industry community. The Passion Project now has over 100 founding partner organisations engaged.The Government's Employer Ownership of Skills programme coming into effect shortly, combined with the forthcoming Apprenticeship Levy in April 2017, is helping to realise the market opportunity for the Company via the Passion Project initiative and we have already been approached by a number of blue chip companies to help them with this new government initiative.As was demonstrated at the launch of the Milestone Foundation at the House of Lords, post year-end, in October 2015, the need for assisting our future talent is topical attracting over 300 industry guests and also marking the establishment of the 500 Quality Apprenticeship programme.The significant and untapped commercial opportunities our multi-channel services offer via our Joint Venture, Nexstar, is a welcome addition to the Company's skill set, further supporting its ethos of audience aggregation, activation and amplification, offering a technological unique selling point ("USP").It is the Board's belief that the combination of our relationships, along with our product set and structure offer the Company an exciting commercial opportunity and a clear market advantage.DevelopmentsPassion Project The Passion Project has continued to attract attention and has gathered momentum throughout the year.In December 2014, the Passion Project was formally launched at the Cass Business School, with over 200 guests, including the Project's ambassadors and over 50 Founding Partners, such as Big Invest, Ambition UK, NCVO, Be the Best 21st Century Legacy, Each One Teach One and many others.All Founding Partners share the Company's vision of using the Passion Project as a common platform through which to help inspire, educate and empower young people whilst helping to tackle youth unemployment.The Project's structure is designed to aggregate all parties involved in the engagement, education and employment of young people whilst also providing a surrounding ecosystem through which to provide both commercial and social opportunities. The Passion Project process has been designed to ensure that its audience is equipped with the tools and skills it needs for life and the world of work, and the employers and industry partners are best placed to identify and engage tomorrow's talent and manage the increasing need for support driven by new Government employment directives.In the run up to the launch event, it was announced that Erith Contractors and The Rank Group Plc had signed up as the first fee-paying corporate members. It has since attracted others including Higgins Construction Plc, Hammersons Plc, Mitre Group Plc, HR in Flow, STM Security Group UK Ltd, BGP Global Services, Box Pensions, Hill Group, Oak Futures, PW Interiors (UK) Ltd, Sonru and others.The Passion Project's digital platform is now under development with the following key stages:Registration / Profile - allowing individuals and corporates to sign up using a variety of devices from desktop, tablet and mobile. Following sign up, the portal will deliver relevant content to users.Game Part 1 - A shortened version of the full game, which will use 1-16 character traits to indicate which areas of employment are most relevant to the user. The platform will now deliver targeted content and the users will gain rewards for registration and completing this initial stage of the Game. Activities - This development will allow activities to be displayed within the platform with sign up functionality, online booking and third party payment functionality. Game Part 2 - The full game, enabling users to match their profile with relevant jobs. Employment - the ability for employers to post jobs and for users to search and apply for them.Passport and achievements - this is a tracking and progress monitor which will allow users to pull in information to show they are growing their experiences and connections to enrich their employment profile. Attracting fee-paying corporate members and sponsorship, including £130,000 in January 2015, was a key milestone in the product's lifecycle, highlighting the early stage commercial viability of the offering. Further commercial discussions are underway, including membership, data, advertising, sponsorship, events and competitions.During the year the initiative has also attracted ambassadors including rapper, songwriter, actor and film director, Ben Drew, primarily known as Plan B, Rosie Chan, (Composer & Pianist) Akram Khan (Dance), Ali Tenant, (Singer/Composer), Amy Bailey (Actress) Jermain Jackman, (Winner of the Voice 2014) Wendy Smith (paralympian) and most recently in December 2015, Alex Pritchard, Tottenham Hotspur professional footballer. These relationships will support the initiative by actively raising awareness of it through social media - this campaign is scheduled to commence in Spring 2016.Education and Training The need for quality emotional intelligence material is evident with numerous Government funding streams being made available to support its development, and a heightened awareness in organisations about the need for a workforce and workplace fit for purpose. The Company has for a number of years been evaluating and preparing an early intervention model that would be acceptable to the UK Department of Education and comply with the Ofsted requirement for the current guidelines surrounding Spiritual, Moral, Social and Cultural (SMSC) education and the recent advice on the promotion of British Values.The Company ran a successful national pilot in 2013/14 in collaboration with Prospects and Prospects Improve, which supported the findings of an earlier study carried out in the US by the RAND organisation. The follow on from this pilot has been slower than anticipated due to a change in management within the proposed distribution partners.The existing agreement with our US partner has now been extended to include the rights to commercialise all materials for additional age ranges which will incorporate those in and outside of the current school system (primary to secondary) as well as those involved in the work programme and Passion Project training age of 14 - 25.Numerous opportunities to incorporate emotional intelligence training are available to the Company via the Passion Project and its partner network as well as a stand-alone offering. This training forms the bedrock of the Passion Project and is now rapidly gaining industry acceptance. A framework entitled "The Ladder" has been designed to showcase how these products can be used in conjunction with the Passion Project to support a holistic solution for young people, training companies, grant givers and prospective employers.Examples where Winning in the Game of Life ("WITGOL") and additional education materials are currently being promoted outside of a traditional distribution partner include: Corporate Partner organisations Section 106 tenders; embedded in training companies delivery of life and work ready courses; and Corporate charitable/sponsorship initiatives.In September 2015, Milestone acquired the funding to deliver WITGOL into 100 schools - this will be monitored and evaluated by the Milestone Foundation and is discussed below.Nexstar In July 2015, the Company signed a Joint Venture agreement with Black Cactus Holdings Pty Ltd ("Black Cactus"). The JV is owned 51% by Milestone and 49% Black Cactus, with a 50:50 revenue share and will be trading as Nexstar.This agreement gave Milestone the opportunity to promote and establish loyalty and reward programmes to members of the Passion Project initiative. This offering was designed to include the provision of a full range of products and services owned and offered by Black Cactus. The Nexstar Platform can be viewed at www.nexstar.org.These services include access to Tier 1 digital content from recognised industry partners and includes products such as music, movies and TV programming in the form of streaming, and transactional services on iOS, Android, Windows, Blackberry and other mobile platforms.The range includes music streaming of 40 million songs to more than 183 countries as well as 43 million tracks of transactional music to 153 countries. The movie and TV platform has a total of 86,000 movies and 300,000 TV Shows that can be streamed or purchased. It also offers an over the top ("OTT") Internet video service with over 1,000 channels streaming live news, documentaries, family programing, sports and 24-hour Music TV.Additional products and services available to Nexstar include hotel booking platform, event ticketing for sports, concerts and shows and a white label mobile merchandise platform. Also included is a Money Over IP platform that supports virtual bank accounts, loyalty and reward cards, prepaid debit cards (using Mastercard products) and a crypto currency service.This agreement was followed, post year-end, in October 2015 by the signing of a partnership agreement between Nexstar and Procurement International Limited, a well-established and recognised leader in the provision of procurement and fulfilment services to the Loyalty and Rewards industry.The relationship with Black Cactus was extended in December 2015 and saw Milestone secure the exclusive global rights to market and commercialise all the existing IP within Black Cactus, thereby extending its offering beyond loyalty and reward programmes. The new agreement allows for a revenue split of 60:40 in favour of the introducing party.This extensive collection of products has created a simple, modular multi-channel offering that can help numerous organisations solve problems in areas including: finance, marketing, distribution, PR, e-commerce and logistics.Readymade opportunities for Nexstar within the Milestone Group include: the provision of virtual bank accounts with pre-paid cards to those without bank accounts identified via the Passion Project; the provision of an affordable "off the shelf" multi-channel network for those with a product or service to promote, for example new and existing talent; and opportunities for charities to white label for fundraising purposes.The first white label site agreed under this new agreement was with the Milestone Foundation for the purpose of raising funding for the Passion Project, its community partners and its initiatives (see below).FoundationThe Milestone Foundation was formally launched, along with the 500 Quality Apprenticeship Alliance ("Alliance") at an event held at the House of Lords post year-end in October 2015.The Alliance was formed to provide sustainable apprenticeship opportunities, with appropriate wages to 500 young people through its partner network during 2016/17. The Alliance intends to maximise employer engagement in the delivery of the apprenticeship framework to help drive improvements in success rates, sustainable employment opportunities and increased industry activity and acceptance.This initiative dovetails with development of the Passion Project and the growing employer awareness of the resulting impact expected due to the Employer Ownership of Skills initiative set to start taking effect as of April 2017.The Foundation has to date secured over 1,000 pledges for apprenticeship placements, which will be evaluated, managed and monitored by industry specific working groups, comprising industry specialists and members from the DWP, Job Centre Plus and Apprenticeships 4 England. It is also engaged in several trailblazer initiatives with further announcements expected in the near future.The on-boarding of a recognised industry delivery team was formally started in August 2015, although discussions had been underway for some time prior. Ensuring that sufficient momentum had been developed to support the need for full-time staff was key. With over 50 organisations on board, the training of young people using Disorder in full swing and a growing number of requests for collaboration, it was necessary to bring on two full-time members of staff, both with significant industry experience, as well as a Commercial Director/Bid Writer. The Foundation is well placed to convert this potential into revenue for the Company through the Passion Project partner sales channel.An example of this being the Foundation's current preparations for the launch of a white-labelled version of the Nexstar platform for the purpose of raising awareness of the Passion Project, its partners and initiatives. The team will use the support of key influencers and celebrities across a wide range of genres, including sport, music, entertainment and fashion, to help promote the platform. Revenue from commission on products sold via the Foundation platform will be split between the Foundation and Nexstar, creating key revenue to support important social initiatives whilst generating revenues for the company.Another initiative of the Foundation has been the establishment of a social impact study using the WITGOL programme. 100 primary schools in areas including East Yorkshire, Sussex and London will participate in a year-long study to measure the behavioural change in young people experienced pre and post participation. Once concluded this evidence will be used to lobby for Central Government funding to provide the programme into primary schools going forward.The promotion of Emotional Intelligence and its associated social impact is one of the three key objectives of the Foundation. As such, it is actively promoting its inclusion in all partner relationships, in-house initiatives, delivery programmes, bids and grant applications.At present the Foundation is involved with three active bids, four draft bids and has 23 expressions of interest registered with Partner organisations.MobileMilestone's Mobile Business Solutions offering has been designed in a simple modular format allowing businesses and organisations the option to create a bespoke solution without excessive software development costs. These modules form the building blocks for a wide range of potential applications that can be used by any organisation to provide a cost effective business solution, facilitating the creation of operational efficiencies and effective collection and management of data.This capability is of interest to many organisations undergoing a shift towards a technology enabled operations model and is becoming more important to those who are required to provide evidence of their services and their impact. The network of relationships offered via the Passion Project and its surrounding ecosystem offers the Company an exciting marketing opportunity especially with the increased need for evidence-based funding in the public sector regarding social impact evaluation.Current modules include:Scheduling and Control Room ManagementBusiness Process ControlRisk AssessmentIncident ReportingTraining ManagementAttendee and Participant Management and MonitoringHuman Resource ManagementMobile Workforce Management and Mobile ApplicationsSurvey Building ToolMulti-Discipline Quotation Tool Timesheet and Financial ManagementThird Party Application IntegrationAdditional bespoke modules can be developed to meet specific needs, a number of which have been created this year. Examples of where our technology is being used includes: During the year, Milestone's relationship with Charlton Athletic Community Trust ("CACT") has continued to develop. In December 2014, CACT agreed to a proposal for Milestone to develop an online monitoring and case study capability with OnSide. This platform will be used by CACT to track and monitor their activities aimed at helping young people to develop and find employment through the use of sport.Post year-end, CACT has further engaged Milestone to provide a Trust-wide solution, which is currently under negotiation for a three-year annuity contract for service.At the end of February 2015, Milestone was engaged by Handy Heroes Ltd to develop a quotation module to be used with OnGuard solution at a value of £15,000.These examples show the flexibility of the Mobile Business Solutions and it is encouraging to see existing clients renewing contracts and returning to expand their relationship with the products.Creative ServicesThe Company's in-house team has remained small and has continued to balance work for external clients with the completion of the remaining in-house product development. Examples of which include: the on-boarding of the Passion Project founding partners; the Passion Project platform build; digitisation of the Disorder magazine; development of mobile modules for data collection; and the Foundation launch. This has offered an opportunity to define the core offering and build a team with the required skill sets to take the company forward.Examples of external works includes:Design and build of large-scale interactive experiences for marketing of pharmaceutical products Multi-channel platform solutions and social media management projectsWebsite design, branding and build across a number of disciplinesDisorderMilestone purchased Disorder in April 2014 and has since relaunched the print version of the magazine as well as producing a new website and app. Disorder will play a key role in the creation of content for the Passion Project and has already attracted a number of supporters from the world of fashion, music, sport and the Arts.The magazine continues to gain awareness, support and interest from the Passion Project network. The Disorder team has continued to train young people as part of the accompanying development and delivery of the magazine, which remains true to its original ethos and is complimentary to the Passion Projects vision. The first phase of commercialising the magazine was completed with the creation of the digital version and the signing of distribution rights with Nexstar in December 2015. The expansion and development of the magazine offering is being actively explored with a number of industry partners with further announcements expected shortly.Since the year-end, Nexstar has agreed to syndicate the content globally. This will provide the magazine with new channels to market and opportunities to increase and engage the audience. This will allow Disorder to take on more training opportunities to help young people gain experience across a range of subjects, including fashion, journalism and photography. The next version of the magazine will be released as a digital download on Apple Newsstand in March 2016. This issue features the likes of Made in Chelsea star, Oliver Proudlock, as well as rising pop starlet, Fleur East, a previous contender on the X Factor, who has since gone on to find fame as a solo artist under Simon Cowell's Syco music label.Management ChangesPost year-end, in January 2016, Patrick Vigors joined the management team as Interim Chief Financial Officer, replacing Jim Brown, who resigned as Group Finance Director. During Jim's time at Milestone, the Company underwent an extensive phase of development and expansion so is now well positioned for growth. This has left the Company with the need for a more full-time finance department. Financial SummaryDuring the year, the Group's net loss was £1,402,542 (2014: £1,071,383, which included a realised gain on the sale of investments of £409,453). Revenues were £318,035 (2014: £157,377) and net liabilities at the period end were £1,706,090 (2014: £1,162,250).These results are presented under European Union Adopted International Financial Reporting Standards ("EU Adopted IFRS").FundingDuring the year, the Company issued 38,125,000 new ordinary shares for a total consideration of £381,250 of which £347,000 was received in cash and £34,250 was in exchange for goods or services received. Since the year-end, the Company has issued 33,077,550 new ordinary shares, raising £293,600 in cash and exchanging £37,176 worth for services. The Company continues to carefully manage its working capital position and will need to raise further monies through subscriptions for new shares in the short term to continue to support its business activities until they are fully revenue generating. The Company is firmly focused on generating revenue through all of its activities, as well as developing further opportunities. Protecting the interest of the Company's shareholders is a priority and the Board's strategy is to seek to raise funds on a basis that is fair to all. OutlookThe growing interest and support for the Passion Project highlights the Company's USP in the digital marketplace. By establishing the Passion Project as an aggregator and amplifier it provides a solution to many and is supported by a product suite designed to help facilitate its Partners' success. The time taken to establish the structure and the team required for its delivery has been longer than anticipated, however the delivery process is now operational and growing rapidly. In light of these and other developments expected shortly the Board feels confident that the Company has now reached an inflection point and is positive about the Company's future going forward.Deborah WhiteChief Executive Officer and Interim Chairman25 February 2016Consolidated statement of comprehensive income for the year ended 30 September 2015            20152014            ££                  Revenue      318,035157,377               Cost of sales        (140,214)  (247,087)               Gross profit / (loss)      177,821(89,710)               Other operating income     -  1,500  Realised gain on disposal     -  409,453  Administrative expenses        (1,573,771)  (1,428,018)                                (1,573,771)  (1,017,065)                   Loss from operations      (1,395,950)(1,106,775)                                     Net finance (expense) / income  (6,592)  35,392                   Loss before taxation   (1,402,542)(1,071,383)                   Taxation charge        -  -                   Net loss for the year      (1,402,542)(1,071,383)              Items which may be reclassified subsequently to profit or loss        Adjustment in carrying value of available for sale investments  -  (14,080)    Items reclassified to profit or loss        Recycling of realised gain on sale of available for sale investments  -  (335,304)                   Total comprehensive loss for the year   (1,402,542)(1,420,767)         Attributable to owners of the parent(1,402,542)(1,420,767)   Basic and diluted loss per share (pence)(0.25)(0.23)Consolidated statement of financial position at 30 September 2015     Company No. 04689130         20152014         ££               Non-current assets      Intangible assets     18,914  56,728          18,91456,728Current assets          Trade and other receivables  63,477  114,983  Cash and cash equivalents  92,495  75,855        155,972190,838               Current liabilities          Trade and other payables     (1,774,449)  (1,336,289)  Interest bearing loans     (106,527)  (73,527)        (1,880,976)(1,409,816)              Net liabilities   (1,706,090)(1,162,250)               Capital and reserves attributable to owners of the Company     Share capital   592,086  553,961  Share premium account   13,395,669  13,056,175  Shares to be issued   502,848  40,000  Merger reserve     11,119,585  11,119,585  Capital redemption reserve     2,732,904  2,732,904  Retained losses     (30,049,182)  (28,664,875) Total Equity   (1,706,090)(1,162,250)Consolidated statement of cash flows for the year ended 30 September 2015 Cash flow from operating activities  2015  2014     £  £           Loss for the year  (1,402,542)  (1,071,383)  Adjustments for:        Amortisation of intangible assets  37,814  37,814  Impairment of investments  -  61,713  Realised gain on disposal of available forsale investments     -    (409,453)  Impairment of goodwill  -  94,947  Net bank and other interest charges  (6,592)  (35,392)  Services settled by the issue of shares  30,619  27,049  Issue of share options charge  18,235  -           Net cash before changes in working capital  (1,322,466)  (1,294,705)           Decrease / (increase) in trade and other receivables  51,507  (64,255)  Increase in trade and other payables  444,743  119,754           Cash outflow from operations  (826,216)  (1,239,206)           Interest received  10  56  Interest paid  (2)  (5,866)           Net cash flows from operating activities  (826,208)  (1,245,016)           Investing activities        Purchase of available for sale investments  -  (232,937)  Proceeds from sale of available for sale investments  -  350,057  Acquisition of intangible assets  -  (1)           Net cash flows used in investing activities  -  117,119           Financing activities        Issue of ordinary share capital  809,848  1,207,467  Repayment of loan  (73,500)  (23,740)  New loans raised  106,500  3,000           Net cash flows from financing activities  842,848  1,186,727                    Net increase in cash  16,640  58,830  Cash and cash equivalents at beginning of year  75,855  17,025           Cash and cash equivalents at end of year  92,495  75,855 Consolidated statement of changes in equity for the year ended 30 September 2015   Share CapitalShare PremiumShares to be issuedOther ReservesRetained EarningsTotal Equity   ££££££                      Balance at  30 Sept 2013 417,17811,847,178109,31313,852,489(27,244,108)(1,017,950)                      Loss for the year  -  -  -  -    (1,071,383)  (1,071,383)  Other comprehensive income  -    -    -    -      (349,384)  (349,384)    Shares issued  136,783  1,208,997  (69,313)  -  -  1,276,467                       Balance at  30 Sept 2014 553,96113,056,17540,00013,852,489(28,664,875)(1,162,250)                      Loss for the year  -  -  -  -    (1,402,542)  (1,402,542)  Cash received in advance of share issue  -  -  462,848  -      -  462,848  Shares issued  38,125  339,494  -  -  -  377,619  Share options  -  -  -  -  18,235  18,235                       Balance at  30 Sept 2015 592,08613,395,669502,84813,852,489(30,049,182)(1,706,090)Notes to the financial statements1. Basis of preparationMilestone Group PLC is a company registered and resident in England and Wales.The financial information set out in this announcement does not constitute the Group's statutory accounts, as defined in Section 435 of the Companies Act 2006, for the years ended 30 September 2015 or 30 September 2014, but is derived from the 2015 Annual Report. Statutory accounts for 2014 have been delivered to the Registrar of Companies and those of 2015 will be delivered in due course.The consolidated statement of comprehensive income, consolidated statement of financial position, consolidated cash flow, consolidated statement of changes in equity (above) and associated notes are extracts from the financial statements and do not constitute the Group's statutory accounts.Statutory accounts for the year to 30 September 2014 and 30 September 2015 have been reported on by the Independent Auditors.The Group financial statements have been prepared and approved by the Directors in accordance with International Financial Reporting Standards as adopted by the EU ("EU Adopted IFRSs").The Independent Auditor's Report on the Annual Report and Financial Statements for 2014 and for 2015 was unqualified, but did draw attention to matters by way of emphasis relating to the basis of preparation, which is reproduced below. This emphasis drew attention to the Company's requirement to manage the timing of settlement of its liabilities and raise funds in the immediate to short term and the profitability of key projects thereafter to satisfy liabilities associated with its activities. It noted that a material uncertainty remains which may cast significant doubt about the Company's ability to continue as a going concern.The basis of preparation is reproduced below.Going ConcernThe Group's business activities, together with the factors likely to affect its future development, performance and position are set out in the Chairman's statement and below. The financial position of the Group, its cash flows, liquidity position and borrowing facilities are described in the financial statements. In addition note 17 to the financial statements includes the Group's objectives, policies and processes for managing its capital; its financial risk management objectives; details of its financial instruments and exposures to credit risk and liquidity risk.The net liability balance sheet position as at 30 September 2015, being the Group's financial year-end, was £1,706,090 (2014: £1,162,250).  Subsequent to the balance sheet date, the Board has been able to agree funding in the form of further share issues raising £293,600 in cash and exchanged £37,175 worth of shares for services received.The Company continues to be reliant upon its continuing ability to manage the timing of settlement both of its current liabilities and future liabilities as they arise. Future fundraising will be required in the immediate to short term thereafter, however developing revenue lines through its various projects, including its subsidiary, Nexstar, and the expansion of the Passion Project, are expected to ease the reliance on fundraising in the coming months.The Company's focus is on the generation of revenues across each of its business units. The Group is already at the contract stage with a number of new customers and, as a result, the Board has prepared forecasts to reflect these new revenues, which show the business becoming self-sustaining in the near future. Should any of these factors not deliver the funding envisaged by the Directors, then alternative sources of funds would continue to be required.The Directors have concluded that the need to generate future funds from further fundraising and from trading activities to satisfy the settlement of its on-going and future liabilities represents a material uncertainty, which may cast significant doubt upon the Group's and the Company's ability to continue as a going concern. Nevertheless after making enquiries and considering this uncertainty and the measures that can be taken to mitigate the uncertainty, the Directors have a reasonable expectation that the Group and the Company will have adequate resources to continue in existence for the foreseeable future. For these reasons they continue to adopt the going concern basis in preparing the annual report and accounts. The financial statements do not include any adjustments that would result if the Group and Company was unable to continue as a going concern.2. Loss per shareThe calculation of the basic loss per share is based on the loss attributable to ordinary shareholders divided by the weighted average number of shares in issue during the year. The calculation of diluted loss per share is based on the basic loss per share, adjusted to allow for the issue of shares and the post tax effect of dividends and interest, on the assumed conversion of all other dilutive options and other potential ordinary shares.There were 104,522,000 share options outstanding at the year-end (2014: 19,085,000). However, the figures for 2015 and 2014 have not been adjusted to reflect conversion of these share options as the effects would be anti-dilutive.     2015  2014    Weighted   Weighted      average Per share average Per share   Lossnumber of AmountLossnumber of amount   £shares Pence£shares Pence Basic and diluted loss per share attributable to shareholders  (1,402,542)  572,401,922  (0.25)  (1,071,383)  471,318,047  (0.23) 3.             Posting of AccountsThe Report and Accounts of Milestone Group PLC, including the Notice of Annual General Meeting will be posted to shareholders shortly.A further announcement will be made by the Company at such time.This announcement is distributed by NASDAQ OMX Corporate Solutions on behalf of NASDAQ OMX Corporate Solutions clients.The issuer of this announcement warrants that they are solely responsible for the content, accuracy and originality of the information contained therein.Source: Milestone Group PLC via GlobenewswireHUG#1990540





























            *All intraday prices are subject to a delay of fifteen (15) minutes.

            FE Investegate takes no responsibility for the accuracy of the information within
            this site.

            The announcements are supplied by the denoted source. Queries about the content
            of an announcement should be directed to the source. FE Investegate reserves the
            right to publish a filtered set of announcements. NAV, EMM/EPT, Rule 8 and FRN Variable
            Rate Fix announcements are filtered from this site.


     ©
                2017 Financial Express. All rights reserved. Visit other
                    FE websites
                    
Go to website
FE Trustnet UK
FE Trustnet Offshore
FE Trustnet Hong Kong
FE Trustnet Middle East
FE Analytics
FE Fundlistings








 Close 


To help us provide a better service, please select the description which fits you best...

Investor with a financial adviser or broker
Investor without a financial adviser or broker
Financial adviser
Market professional (broker, banker, solicitor, etc)
Discretionary fund manager
Institutional investor



Close this window
Why are you asking me this question?





Related Instruments












 This website is for Private Investors* only

To continue using FE Investegate, please confirm that you are a private investor.

I am a private investor * I am not a private investor



    *A Private Investor is a recipient of the information who meets all of the conditions set out below, the recipient:
    1. Obtains access to the information in a personal capacity;
    2. Is not required to be regulated or supervised by a body concerned with the regulation or supervision of investment or financial services;
    3. Is not currently registered or qualified as a professional securities trader or investment adviser with any national or state exchange, regulatory authority, professional association or recognised professional body;
    4. Does not currently act in any capacity as an investment adviser, whether or not they have at some time been qualified to do so;
    5. Uses the information solely in relation to the management of their personal funds and not as a trader to the public or for the investment of corporate funds;
    6. Does not distribute, republish or otherwise provide any information or derived works to any third party in any manner or use or process information or derived works for any commercial purposes.
    







 To continue to use FE Investegate, please confirm you are a private investor

This website is only for private investors. By using this site, you agree to use the content for private use only.
Please confirm that you are a private investor using the buttons below.

I am a private investor I am not a private investor












        a d v e r t i s e m e n t

























		Milestone Group PLC : Final Results - RNS - London Stock Exchange

 






 




 



Regulatory Story


Go to market news section

  
			
			










Milestone Group PLC  -  MSG   
Milestone Group PLC : Final Results
Released 07:00 26-Feb-2016













Milestone Group PLC : Final Results
MILESTONE GROUP PLC("Milestone" or the "Company") Final Results Milestone, the AIM quoted (AIM: MSG) provider of digital media and technology solutions, announces its final results for the year ended 30 September 2015.  Highlights   Research and development work across all product ranges is all but complete and marketing has commenced   Passion Project formally launched at the Cass Business School with 50 Founding partners   Fee paying corporate members, sponsors and key ambassadors supporting the Passion Project   Nexstar joint venture established with Black Cactus Holdings Pty Ltd offering multiple revenue opportunities   First contract signed for Nexstar with Procurement International Ltd, post year-end   White-labelled version of the Nexstar Rewards site agreed with Milestone Foundation   Key Personnel recruited for Passion Project and Foundation   Pilot of Passion Project community programmes commenced    Passion Project featured in key industry events   Development of additional modules for both OnSide and OnGuard   Release of Disorder Magazine in both print and digital versions   Winning in the Game of Life ("WITGOL") being rolled out into 100 Schools, post year-end   Expanded the Spirituality for Kids ("SFK") licence with the US    Deborah White, CEO and Interim Chairman, commented:  "The vision to build a brand synonymous with the generation of shareholder value and the creation of social change has been the raison d'etre behind the repositioning of Milestone since my joining in March 2008. Creating both a business model and a product that was a true differentiator in the media and technology marketplace was key to fulfilling that vision. I am delighted to confirm that, whilst this has taken longer than anticipated to materialise, the building blocks are now complete and key partners engaged.  "This has been a year of consolidation, with the Passion Project now firmly established as our flagship product and our business model of creating shareholder value and social impact realised as a leading innovator in the commercial marketplace. This coming year will be pivotal for Milestone as we concentrate on revenue generation now that the research and development phase has been completed."  For further information  Milestone Group PLCDeborah White, Chief Executive     Tel: 020 7929 7826    Cairn Financial Advisers LLP, Nominated AdviserLiam Murray / Avi Robinson       Tel: 020 7148 7900    Hybridan LLP, BrokerClaire Louise Noyce       Tel: 020 3764 2341  CHAIRMAN'S STATEMENT Foreword The vision to build a brand synonymous with the generation of shareholder value and the creation of social change has been the raison d'etre behind the repositioning of Milestone since my joining in March 2008. Creating both a business model and a product that was a true differentiator in the media and technology marketplace was key to fulfilling that vision. I am delighted to confirm that, whilst this has taken longer than anticipated to materialise, the building blocks are now complete and key partners engaged.  This has been a year of consolidation, with the Passion Project now firmly established as our flagship product and our business model of creating shareholder value and social impact realised as a leading innovator in the commercial marketplace. This coming year will be pivotal for Milestone as we concentrate on revenue generation now that the research and development phase has been completed.  There is an ever-growing understanding of the Passion Project, its purpose and the commercial opportunities available for products and services offered by Milestone in supporting its development and delivery. The DNA of the initiative, to help young people become life ready as well as work ready, encapsulates the growing realisation and public acceptance of the need for a work force with "emotional intelligence" as well as work related skills training. Requests for the Passion Project's attendance at Industry events is a clear demonstration of acceptance and a result of significant groundwork that has been carried out behind the scenes over recent years. This is perhaps best demonstrated by the granting of Platinum sponsorship status to the Passion Project at the Annual Apprenticeship 4 England event at the Emirates Stadium, post year-end, on 25/26 February 2016. The operational team required to commercialise the initiative is in place and is industry proven. The team's knowledge of the marketplace has resulted in the Passion Project's inclusion in numerous partner bids along with being actively promoted throughout a growing industry community. The Passion Project now has over 100 founding partner organisations engaged.  The Government's Employer Ownership of Skills programme coming into effect shortly, combined with the forthcoming Apprenticeship Levy in April 2017, is helping to realise the market opportunity for the Company via the Passion Project initiative and we have already been approached by a number of blue chip companies to help them with this new government initiative. As was demonstrated at the launch of the Milestone Foundation at the House of Lords, post year-end, in October 2015, the need for assisting our future talent is topical attracting over 300 industry guests and also marking the establishment of the 500 Quality Apprenticeship programme. The significant and untapped commercial opportunities our multi-channel services offer via our Joint Venture, Nexstar, is a welcome addition to the Company's skill set, further supporting its ethos of audience aggregation, activation and amplification, offering a technological unique selling point ("USP"). It is the Board's belief that the combination of our relationships, along with our product set and structure offer the Company an exciting commercial opportunity and a clear market advantage.  Developments Passion Project  The Passion Project has continued to attract attention and has gathered momentum throughout the year.  In December 2014, the Passion Project was formally launched at the Cass Business School, with over 200 guests, including the Project's ambassadors and over 50 Founding Partners, such as Big Invest, Ambition UK, NCVO, Be the Best 21st Century Legacy, Each One Teach One and many others.  All Founding Partners share the Company's vision of using the Passion Project as a common platform through which to help inspire, educate and empower young people whilst helping to tackle youth unemployment.  The Project's structure is designed to aggregate all parties involved in the engagement, education and employment of young people whilst also providing a surrounding ecosystem through which to provide both commercial and social opportunities. The Passion Project process has been designed to ensure that its audience is equipped with the tools and skills it needs for life and the world of work, and the employers and industry partners are best placed to identify and engage tomorrow's talent and manage the increasing need for support driven by new Government employment directives. In the run up to the launch event, it was announced that Erith Contractors and The Rank Group Plc had signed up as the first fee-paying corporate members. It has since attracted others including Higgins Construction Plc, Hammersons Plc, Mitre Group Plc, HR in Flow, STM Security Group UK Ltd, BGP Global Services, Box Pensions, Hill Group, Oak Futures, PW Interiors (UK) Ltd, Sonru and others.  The Passion Project's digital platform is now under development with the following key stages:    Registration / Profile - allowing individuals and corporates to sign up using a variety of devices from desktop, tablet and mobile. Following sign up, the portal will deliver relevant content to users.   Game Part 1 - A shortened version of the full game, which will use 1-16 character traits to indicate which areas of employment are most relevant to the user. The platform will now deliver targeted content and the users will gain rewards for registration and completing this initial stage of the Game.    Activities - This development will allow activities to be displayed within the platform with sign up functionality, online booking and third party payment functionality.    Game Part 2 - The full game, enabling users to match their profile with relevant jobs.    Employment - the ability for employers to post jobs and for users to search and apply for them.   Passport and achievements - this is a tracking and progress monitor which will allow users to pull in information to show they are growing their experiences and connections to enrich their employment profile.    Attracting fee-paying corporate members and sponsorship, including £130,000 in January 2015, was a key milestone in the product's lifecycle, highlighting the early stage commercial viability of the offering. Further commercial discussions are underway, including membership, data, advertising, sponsorship, events and competitions. During the year the initiative has also attracted ambassadors including rapper, songwriter, actor and film director, Ben Drew, primarily known as Plan B, Rosie Chan, (Composer & Pianist) Akram Khan (Dance), Ali Tenant, (Singer/Composer), Amy Bailey (Actress) Jermain Jackman, (Winner of the Voice 2014) Wendy Smith (paralympian) and most recently in December 2015, Alex Pritchard, Tottenham Hotspur professional footballer. These relationships will support the initiative by actively raising awareness of it through social media - this campaign is scheduled to commence in Spring 2016. Education and Training  The need for quality emotional intelligence material is evident with numerous Government funding streams being made available to support its development, and a heightened awareness in organisations about the need for a workforce and workplace fit for purpose. The Company has for a number of years been evaluating and preparing an early intervention model that would be acceptable to the UK Department of Education and comply with the Ofsted requirement for the current guidelines surrounding Spiritual, Moral, Social and Cultural (SMSC) education and the recent advice on the promotion of British Values. The Company ran a successful national pilot in 2013/14 in collaboration with Prospects and Prospects Improve, which supported the findings of an earlier study carried out in the US by the RAND organisation. The follow on from this pilot has been slower than anticipated due to a change in management within the proposed distribution partners. The existing agreement with our US partner has now been extended to include the rights to commercialise all materials for additional age ranges which will incorporate those in and outside of the current school system (primary to secondary) as well as those involved in the work programme and Passion Project training age of 14 - 25. Numerous opportunities to incorporate emotional intelligence training are available to the Company via the Passion Project and its partner network as well as a stand-alone offering. This training forms the bedrock of the Passion Project and is now rapidly gaining industry acceptance. A framework entitled "The Ladder" has been designed to showcase how these products can be used in conjunction with the Passion Project to support a holistic solution for young people, training companies, grant givers and prospective employers.  Examples where Winning in the Game of Life ("WITGOL") and additional education materials are currently being promoted outside of a traditional distribution partner include: Corporate Partner organisations Section 106 tenders; embedded in training companies delivery of life and work ready courses; and Corporate charitable/sponsorship initiatives. In September 2015, Milestone acquired the funding to deliver WITGOL into 100 schools - this will be monitored and evaluated by the Milestone Foundation and is discussed below.  Nexstar  In July 2015, the Company signed a Joint Venture agreement with Black Cactus Holdings Pty Ltd ("Black Cactus"). The JV is owned 51% by Milestone and 49% Black Cactus, with a 50:50 revenue share and will be trading as Nexstar.This agreement gave Milestone the opportunity to promote and establish loyalty and reward programmes to members of the Passion Project initiative. This offering was designed to include the provision of a full range of products and services owned and offered by Black Cactus. The Nexstar Platform can be viewed at www.nexstar.org. These services include access to Tier 1 digital content from recognised industry partners such as Apple, iTunes, Google, Microsoft, Spotify and includes products such as movies, TV shows, eBooks, music, apps and games as well as other services including travel services, access, events, ticketing, streaming services, merchandise, Money over IP, Crypto currency services, prepaid cards, and debit and credit cards via Mastercard. This agreement was followed, post year-end, in October 2015 by the signing of a partnership agreement with Procurement International Limited, a well-established and recognised leader in the fulfilment provider to the Loyalty and Rewards industry. This agreement created an exclusive arrangement for the promotion and distribution of these services into the Loyalty and Rewards industry. The network of existing Loyalty and Rewards partnerships made available through this relationship spans 183 countries and includes a global audience of over 40 million participants. This partnership gives Milestone access, via Procurement, to a significant, ready-made, online audience for the promotion and distribution of the Disorder magazine.  Nexstar offers multiple revenue opportunities; examples include commissions across all products and services purchased via the site, advertising, sponsorship, product placement, licence and maintenance fees, amongst others. The relationship with Black Cactus was extended in December 2015 and saw Milestone secure the exclusive global rights to market and commercialise all the existing IP within Black Cactus, thereby extending its offering beyond loyalty and reward programmes. The new agreement allows for a revenue split of 60:40 in favour of the introducing party.  This extensive collection of products has created a simple modular multi-channel offering that can help numerous organisations solve problems in areas including: finance, marketing, distribution, PR, e-commerce and logistics amongst others. Examples of opportunities include: the provision of pre-paid cards to those without bank accounts identified via the Passion Project; the provision of an affordable "off the shelf multi-channel network" for those with a product or service to promote, for example new and existing talent; and opportunities for charities to white label for fundraising purposes. The first white label site agreed under this new agreement was with the Milestone Foundation for the purpose of raising funding for the Passion Project, its community partners and its initiatives (see below). Foundation The Milestone Foundation was formally launched, along with the 500 Quality Apprenticeship Alliance ("Alliance") at an event held at the House of Lords post year-end in October 2015.  The Alliance was formed to provide sustainable apprenticeship opportunities, with appropriate wages to 500 young people through its partner network during 2016/17. The Alliance intends to maximise employer engagement in the delivery of the apprenticeship framework to help drive improvements in success rates, sustainable employment opportunities and increased industry activity and acceptance.  This initiative dovetails with development of the Passion Project and the growing employer awareness of the resulting impact expected due to the Employer Ownership of Skills initiative set to start taking effect as of April 2017. The Foundation has to date secured over 1,000 pledges for apprenticeship placements, which will be evaluated, managed and monitored by industry specific working groups, comprising industry specialists and members from the DWP, Job Centre Plus and Apprenticeships 4 England. It is also engaged in several trailblazer initiatives with further announcements expected in the near future. The on-boarding of a recognised industry delivery team was formally started in August 2015, although discussions had been underway for some time prior. Ensuring that sufficient momentum had been developed to support the need for full-time staff was key. With over 50 organisations on board, the training of young people using Disorder in full swing and a growing number of requests for collaboration, it was necessary to bring on two full-time members of staff, both with significant industry experience, as well as a Commercial Director/Bid Writer. The Foundation is well placed to convert this potential into revenue for the Company through the Passion Project partner sales channel. An example of this being the Foundation's current preparations for the launch of a white-labelled version of the Nexstar platform for the purpose of raising awareness of the Passion Project, its partners and initiatives. The team will use the support of key influencers and celebrities across a wide range of genres, including sport, music, entertainment and fashion, to help promote the platform. Revenue from commission on products sold via the Foundation platform will be split between the Foundation and Nexstar, creating key revenue to support important social initiatives whilst generating revenues for the company. Another initiative of the Foundation has been the establishment of a social impact study using the WITGOL programme. 100 primary schools in areas including East Yorkshire, Sussex and London will participate in a year-long study to measure the behavioural change in young people experienced pre and post participation. Once concluded this evidence will be used to lobby for Central Government funding to provide the programme into primary schools going forward. The promotion of Emotional Intelligence and its associated social impact is one of the three key objectives of the Foundation. As such, it is actively promoting its inclusion in all partner relationships, in-house initiatives, delivery programmes, bids and grant applications. At present the Foundation is involved with three active bids, four draft bids and has 23 expressions of interest registered with Partner organisations. Mobile Milestone's Mobile Business Solutions offering has been designed in a simple modular format allowing businesses and organisations the option to create a bespoke solution without excessive software development costs. These modules form the building blocks for a wide range of potential applications that can be used by any organisation to provide a cost effective business solution, facilitating the creation of operational efficiencies and effective collection and management of data. This capability is of interest to many organisations undergoing a shift towards a technology enabled operations model and is becoming more important to those who are required to provide evidence of their services and their impact. The network of relationships offered via the Passion Project and its surrounding ecosystem offers the Company an exciting marketing opportunity especially with the increased need for evidence-based funding in the public sector regarding social impact evaluation. Current modules include:    Scheduling and Control Room Management   Business Process Control   Risk Assessment   Incident Reporting   Training Management   Attendee and Participant Management and Monitoring   Human Resource Management   Mobile Workforce Management and Mobile Applications   Survey Building Tool   Multi-Discipline Quotation Tool    Timesheet and Financial Management   Third Party Application Integration   Additional bespoke modules can be developed to meet specific needs, a number of which have been created this year. Examples of where our technology is being used includes:   During the year, Milestone's relationship with Charlton Athletic Community Trust ("CACT") has continued to develop. In December 2014, CACT agreed to a proposal for Milestone to develop an online monitoring and case study capability with OnSide. This platform will be used by CACT to track and monitor their activities aimed at helping young people to develop and find employment through the use of sport.  Post year-end, CACT has further engaged Milestone to provide a Trust-wide solution, which is currently under negotiation for a three-year annuity contract for service.  At the end of February 2015, Milestone was engaged by Handy Heroes Ltd to develop a quotation module to be used with OnGuard solution at a value of £15,000.  These examples show the flexibility of the Mobile Business Solutions and it is encouraging to see existing clients renewing contracts and returning to expand their relationship with the products. Creative Services The Company's in-house team has remained small and has continued to balance work for external clients with the completion of the remaining in-house product development. Examples of which include: the on-boarding of the Passion Project founding partners; the Passion Project platform build; digitisation of the Disorder magazine; development of mobile modules for data collection; and the Foundation launch. This has offered an opportunity to define the core offering and build a team with the required skill sets to take the company forward. Examples of external works includes:    Design and build of large-scale interactive experiences for marketing of pharmaceutical products    Multi-channel platform solutions and social media management projects   Website design, branding and build across a number of disciplines   Disorder Milestone purchased Disorder in April 2014 and has since relaunched the print version of the magazine as well as producing a new website and app. Disorder will play a key role in the creation of content for the Passion Project and has already attracted a number of supporters from the world of fashion, music, sport and the Arts. The magazine continues to gain awareness, support and interest from the Passion Project network. The Disorder team has continued to train young people as part of the accompanying development and delivery of the magazine, which remains true to its original ethos and is complimentary to the Passion Projects vision. The first phase of commercialising the magazine was completed with the creation of the digital version and the signing of distribution rights with Nexstar in December 2015. The expansion and development of the magazine offering is being actively explored with a number of industry partners with further announcements expected shortly. Since the year-end, Nexstar has agreed to syndicate the content globally. This will provide the magazine with new channels to market and opportunities to increase and engage the audience. This will allow Disorder to take on more training opportunities to help young people gain experience across a range of subjects, including fashion, journalism and photography.   The next version of the magazine will be released as a digital download on Apple Newsstand in March 2016. This issue features the likes of Made in Chelsea star, Oliver Proudlock, as well as rising pop starlet, Fleur East, a previous contender on the X Factor, who has since gone on to find fame as a solo artist under Simon Cowell's Syco music label.  Management Changes Post year-end, in January 2016, Patrick Vigors joined the management team as Interim Chief Financial Officer, replacing Jim Brown, who resigned as Group Finance Director. During Jim's time at Milestone, the Company underwent an extensive phase of development and expansion so is now well positioned for growth. This has left the Company with the need for a more full-time finance department.   Financial Summary During the year, the Group's net loss was £1,402,542 (2014: £1,071,383, which included a realised gain on the sale of investments of £409,453). Revenues were £318,035 (2014: £157,377) and net liabilities at the period end were £1,706,090 (2014: £1,162,250).  These results are presented under European Union Adopted International Financial Reporting Standards ("EU Adopted IFRS").  Funding During the year, the Company issued 38,125,000 new ordinary shares for a total consideration of £381,250 of which £347,000 was received in cash and £34,250 was in exchange for goods or services received. Since the year-end, the Company has issued 33,077,550 new ordinary shares, raising £293,600 in cash and exchanging £37,176 worth for services. The Company continues to carefully manage its working capital position and will need to raise further monies through subscriptions for new shares in the short term to continue to support its business activities until they are fully revenue generating.  The Company is firmly focused on generating revenue through all of its activities, as well as developing further opportunities. Protecting the interest of the Company's shareholders is a priority and the Board's strategy is to seek to raise funds on a basis that is fair to all.  Outlook The growing interest and support for the Passion Project highlights the Company's USP in the digital marketplace. By establishing the Passion Project as an aggregator and amplifier it provides a solution to many and is supported by a product suite designed to help facilitate its Partners' success.   The time taken to establish the structure and the team required for its delivery has been longer than anticipated, however the delivery process is now operational and growing rapidly. In light of these and other developments expected shortly the Board feels confident that the Company has now reached an inflection point and is positive about the Company's future going forward. Deborah WhiteChief Executive Officer and Interim Chairman 25 February 2016 Consolidated statement of comprehensive income for the year ended 30 September 2015              2015  2014              £  £                    Revenue        318,035  157,377                    Cost of sales        (140,214)  (247,087)                    Gross profit / (loss)        177,821  (89,710)                    Other operating income     -  1,500  Realised gain on disposal     -  409,453  Administrative expenses        (1,573,771)  (1,428,018)                                (1,573,771)  (1,017,065)                    Loss from operations        (1,395,950)  (1,106,775)                                      Net finance (expense) / income  (6,592)  35,392                    Loss before taxation     (1,402,542)  (1,071,383)                    Taxation charge        -  -                    Net loss for the year        (1,402,542)  (1,071,383)                 Items which may be reclassified subsequently to profit or loss        Adjustment in carrying value of available for sale investments  -  (14,080)    Items reclassified to profit or loss        Recycling of realised gain on sale of available for sale investments  -  (335,304)                    Total comprehensive loss for the year     (1,402,542)  (1,420,767)                 Attributable to owners of the parent  (1,402,542)  (1,420,767)           Basic and diluted loss per share (pence)  (0.25)  (0.23)  Consolidated statement of financial position at 30 September 2015     Company No. 04689130           2015  2014           £  £                 Non-current assets           Intangible assets     18,914  56,728           18,914  56,728  Current assets           Trade and other receivables  63,477  114,983  Cash and cash equivalents  92,495  75,855           155,972  190,838                 Current liabilities           Trade and other payables     (1,774,449)  (1,336,289)  Interest bearing loans     (106,527)  (73,527)           (1,880,976)  (1,409,816)                          Net liabilities     (1,706,090)  (1,162,250)                 Capital and reserves attributable to owners of the Company        Share capital     592,086  553,961  Share premium account     13,395,669  13,056,175  Shares to be issued     502,848  40,000  Merger reserve     11,119,585  11,119,585  Capital redemption reserve     2,732,904  2,732,904  Retained losses     (30,049,182)  (28,664,875)  Total Equity     (1,706,090)  (1,162,250)  Consolidated statement of cash flows for the year ended 30 September 2015  Cash flow from operating activities  2015  2014     £  £           Loss for the year  (1,402,542)  (1,071,383)  Adjustments for:        Amortisation of intangible assets  37,814  37,814  Impairment of investments  -  61,713  Realised gain on disposal of available forsale investments     -    (409,453)  Impairment of goodwill  -  94,947  Net bank and other interest charges  (6,592)  (35,392)  Services settled by the issue of shares  30,619  27,049  Issue of share options charge  18,235  -           Net cash before changes in working capital  (1,322,466)  (1,294,705)           Decrease / (increase) in trade and other receivables  51,507  (64,255)  Increase in trade and other payables  444,743  119,754           Cash outflow from operations  (826,216)  (1,239,206)           Interest received  10  56  Interest paid  (2)  (5,866)           Net cash flows from operating activities  (826,208)  (1,245,016)           Investing activities        Purchase of available for sale investments  -  (232,937)  Proceeds from sale of available for sale investments  -  350,057  Acquisition of intangible assets  -  (1)           Net cash flows used in investing activities  -  117,119           Financing activities        Issue of ordinary share capital  809,848  1,207,467  Repayment of loan  (73,500)  (23,740)  New loans raised  106,500  3,000           Net cash flows from financing activities  842,848  1,186,727                    Net increase in cash  16,640  58,830  Cash and cash equivalents at beginning of year  75,855  17,025           Cash and cash equivalents at end of year  92,495  75,855  Consolidated statement of changes in equity for the year ended 30 September 2015     Share Capital  Share Premium  Shares to be issued  Other Reserves  Retained Earnings  Total Equity     £  £  £  £  £  £                       Balance at 30 Sept 2013   417,178  11,847,178  109,313  13,852,489  (27,244,108)  (1,017,950)                       Loss for the year  -  -  -  -    (1,071,383)  (1,071,383)  Other comprehensive income  -    -    -    -      (349,384)  (349,384)    Shares issued  136,783  1,208,997  (69,313)  -  -  1,276,467                       Balance at 30 Sept 2014   553,961  13,056,175  40,000  13,852,489  (28,664,875)  (1,162,250)                       Loss for the year  -  -  -  -    (1,402,542)  (1,402,542)  Cash received in advance of share issue  -  -  462,848  -      -  462,848  Shares issued  38,125  339,494  -  -  -  377,619  Share options  -  -  -  -  18,235  18,235                       Balance at 30 Sept 2015   592,086  13,395,669  502,848  13,852,489  (30,049,182)  (1,706,090)  Notes to the financial statements 1. Basis of preparation Milestone Group PLC is a company registered and resident in England and Wales. The financial information set out in this announcement does not constitute the Group's statutory accounts, as defined in Section 435 of the Companies Act 2006, for the years ended 30 September 2015 or 30 September 2014, but is derived from the 2015 Annual Report. Statutory accounts for 2014 have been delivered to the Registrar of Companies and those of 2015 will be delivered in due course. The consolidated statement of comprehensive income, consolidated statement of financial position, consolidated cash flow, consolidated statement of changes in equity (above) and associated notes are extracts from the financial statements and do not constitute the Group's statutory accounts. Statutory accounts for the year to 30 September 2014 and 30 September 2015 have been reported on by the Independent Auditors. The Group financial statements have been prepared and approved by the Directors in accordance with International Financial Reporting Standards as adopted by the EU ("EU Adopted IFRSs"). The Independent Auditor's Report on the Annual Report and Financial Statements for 2014 and for 2015 was unqualified, but did draw attention to matters by way of emphasis relating to the basis of preparation, which is reproduced below. This emphasis drew attention to the Company's requirement to manage the timing of settlement of its liabilities and raise funds in the immediate to short term and the profitability of key projects thereafter to satisfy liabilities associated with its activities. It noted that a material uncertainty remains which may cast significant doubt about the Company's ability to continue as a going concern. The basis of preparation is reproduced below. Going Concern The Group's business activities, together with the factors likely to affect its future development, performance and position are set out in the Chairman's statement and below. The financial position of the Group, its cash flows, liquidity position and borrowing facilities are described in the financial statements. In addition note 17 to the financial statements includes the Group's objectives, policies and processes for managing its capital; its financial risk management objectives; details of its financial instruments and exposures to credit risk and liquidity risk. The net liability balance sheet position as at 30 September 2015, being the Group's financial year-end, was £1,706,090 (2014: £1,162,250).  Subsequent to the balance sheet date, the Board has been able to agree funding in the form of further share issues raising £293,600 in cash and exchanged £37,175 worth of shares for services received.  The Company continues to be reliant upon its continuing ability to manage the timing of settlement both of its current liabilities and future liabilities as they arise. Future fundraising will be required in the immediate to short term thereafter, however developing revenue lines through its various projects, including its subsidiary, Nexstar, and the expansion of the Passion Project, are expected to ease the reliance on fundraising in the coming months.  The Company's focus is on the generation of revenues across each of its business units. The Group is already at the contract stage with a number of new customers and, as a result, the Board has prepared forecasts to reflect these new revenues, which show the business becoming self-sustaining in the near future. Should any of these factors not deliver the funding envisaged by the Directors, then alternative sources of funds would continue to be required.  The Directors have concluded that the need to generate future funds from further fundraising and from trading activities to satisfy the settlement of its on-going and future liabilities represents a material uncertainty, which may cast significant doubt upon the Group's and the Company's ability to continue as a going concern. Nevertheless after making enquiries and considering this uncertainty and the measures that can be taken to mitigate the uncertainty, the Directors have a reasonable expectation that the Group and the Company will have adequate resources to continue in existence for the foreseeable future. For these reasons they continue to adopt the going concern basis in preparing the annual report and accounts. The financial statements do not include any adjustments that would result if the Group and Company was unable to continue as a going concern. 2. Loss per share The calculation of the basic loss per share is based on the loss attributable to ordinary shareholders divided by the weighted average number of shares in issue during the year. The calculation of diluted loss per share is based on the basic loss per share, adjusted to allow for the issue of shares and the post tax effect of dividends and interest, on the assumed conversion of all other dilutive options and other potential ordinary shares.            There were 104,522,000 share options outstanding at the year-end (2014: 19,085,000). However, the figures for 2015 and 2014 have not been adjusted to reflect conversion of these share options as the effects would be anti-dilutive.           2015        2014        Weighted         Weighted            average   Per share     average   Per share     Loss  number of   Amount  Loss  number of   amount     £  shares   Pence  £  shares   Pence  Basic and diluted loss per share attributable to shareholders  (1,402,542)  572,401,922  (0.25)  (1,071,383)  471,318,047  (0.23)  3.             Posting of Accounts The Report and Accounts of Milestone Group PLC, including the Notice of Annual General Meeting will be posted to shareholders shortly.  A further announcement will be made by the Company at such time. This announcement is distributed by NASDAQ OMX Corporate Solutions on behalf of NASDAQ OMX Corporate Solutions clients.The issuer of this announcement warrants that they are solely responsible for the content, accuracy and originality of the information contained therein.Source: Milestone Group PLC via GlobenewswireHUG#1989613



Close


 

 















 






 



London Stock Exchange plc is not responsible for and does not check content on this Website. Website users are responsible for checking content. Any news item (including any prospectus) which is addressed solely to the persons and countries specified therein should not be relied upon other than by such persons and/or outside the specified countries. Terms and conditions, including restrictions on use and distribution apply.



©2014 London Stock Exchange plc. All rights reserved



 
Milestone Group PLC : Final Results - RNS











 